


Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft













4imprint Promotional Products | Promo Items, Giveaways with Your Logo























Skip to Content

USA


search






advancedsearch




Call us toll free
1-877-446-7746


Loading call wait time...






  





Shop by Category

Shop by Category
Close this Menu


Apparel

All Categories
All Apparel

T-Shirts

Back
All T-Shirts
Promotional Tees
Athletic T Shirts
Fashion T Shirts
Tank Tops



Dress Shirts

Back
All Dress Shirts
Easy-Care Dress Shirts
Oxford Dress Shirts
Poplin Dress Shirts
Short Sleeve Dress Shirts
Twill Dress Shirts



Uniforms

Back
All Uniforms
Polos & Shirts for Uniforms
Food Service Uniforms
Hospitality Uniforms
Housekeeping Uniforms
Lab & Medical Uniforms
Security Uniforms



Polo Shirts

Back
All Polo Shirts
Cotton Polo Shirts
Golf & Sport Polo Shirts
Performance Polo Shirts
Pique Polo Shirts
Poly-Cotton Polo Shirts



Outerwear

Back
All Outerwear
Fleece Jackets & Vests
Insulated Outerwear
Lightweight Outerwear
Soft Shell Outerwear
Vests



Other Apparel

Back
All Other Apparel
Aprons
Bandanas
Pants & Shorts
Scarves



Sweatshirts

Back
All Sweatshirts
Crewneck Sweatshirts
Full Zip Sweatshirts
Hoodies



Headwear

Back
All Headwear
Baseball Hats
Beanies
Visors



Women's Apparel

Back
All Women's Apparel
Women's Dress Shirts
Women's Outerwear
Women's Polo Shirts
Women's T-Shirts


Sweaters & Cardigans
Athletic Apparel

Quick Links

Back
24 Hour Rush in Apparel
Hot Products in Apparel
New Products in Apparel
Sale Products in Apparel



Embroidered Apparel

Back
Embroidered Polo Shirts
Embroidered Outerwear
Embroidered Dress Shirts
Embroidered Headwear
Embroidered Sweatshirts



Shop by Brand

Back
Hanes Branded Apparel
Nike Branded Apparel
Under Armour Branded Apparel
Eddie Bauer Branded Apparel
Columbia Branded Apparel
Cutter & BuckBranded Apparel
Gildan Branded Apparel
Jerzees Branded Apparel
Champion Branded Apparel
Shop All Brands



Popular Products in Apparel




Crossland Fleece Jacket - Men's
On sale from $15.95





















Silk Touch Performance Sport Polo - Men's
$10.95 to $24.95





















Hanes Tagless T-Shirt - Screen - Colors
On sale from $4.35





















Blue Generation Peached Fine Line Twill Shirt – Ladies’
$15.75 to $31.50




















 

Auto, Home & Tools

All Categories
All Auto, Home & Tools

Auto Accessories

Back
All Auto Accessories
Ice Scrapers
Organizers
Safety Kits



Keychains

Back
All Keychains
Carabiners
Shaped Keychains
Bottle Openers



Living

Back
All Living
Coasters
Ornaments
Wine Accessories


Food & Lunch Containers
Pet Supplies
Flashlights

Kitchenware

Back
All Kitchenware
Chip Clips
Jar Openers



Tape Measures

Back
All Tape Measures
Pocket Size Tape Masures


Key Lights

Lawn & Garden

Back
All Lawn & Garden
Seeds & Grow-kits



Tools

Back
All Tools
Knives
Screwdrivers
Multi-tools & Kits



Quick Links

Back
24 Hour Rush in Auto, Home & Tools
Hot Products in Auto, Home & Tools
New Products in Auto, Home & Tools
Sale Products in Auto, Home & Tools



Popular Products in Auto, Home & Tools




Single Port USB Car Charger
99¢ to $1.79





















Salad Shaker Set
On sale from $1.89





















Keep-it Clip - 4" - Opaque
49¢ to 87¢





















Rectangular Key Light - Translucent
On sale from 57¢




















 

Bags

All Categories
All Bags

Totes

Back
All Totes
Shopping & Grocery
Trade Show Totes
Cotton Totes



Laptop & Tablet Bags

Back
All Laptop & Tablet Bags
Laptop Backpacks
Briefs & Messengers
Tech Cases & Pouches



Travel

Back
All Travel
Luggage Tags
Luggage & Travel Bags
Toiletry Bags



Coolers

Back
All Coolers
Lunch Bags & Sets
Outdoor & Event Coolers



Business Bags

Back
All Business Bags
Briefcase Bags
Messenger Bags



Plastic Bags

Back
All Plastic Bags
Biodegradable Bags
Full Color Bags


Drawstring Sportpacks
Backpacks
Paper Bags
Duffels & Gym Bags
Wallets
Gift Bags

Embroidered Bags

All Embroidered Bags
Backpacks
Business Bags
Duffels
Totes



Quick Links

Back
24 Hour Rush
Hot Products
New Products
Sale Products



Shop by Brand

All Bags
KOOZIE®
High Sierra
Coleman
Wenger
Cutter & Buck
Carhartt
Slazenger
Igloo
Case Logic
Nike
Shop All Brands



Popular Products in Bags




Wave Slingpack - Screen
$3.89 to $6.59





















Metro Shopper Tote
$1.35 to $2.45





















Championship Duffel
$5.25 to $8.99





















Square Non-Woven Lunch Bag
$1.69 to $2.99




















 

Drinkware

All Categories
All Drinkware

Water Bottles

Back
All Water Bottles
Recyclable Water Bottles
Metal Water Bottles
Tritan Water Bottles
Glass Water Bottles



Travel Mugs & Tumblers

Back
All Travel Mugs & Tumblers
Plastic Travel Mugs & Tumblers
Stainless Travel Mugs & Tumblers



Beverage Holders

Back
All Beverage Holders
Can Coolers
Bottle Coolers



Plastic Cups

Back
All Plastic Cups
Acrylic Cups w/Straws
Stadium Cups


Vacuum Insulated

Glassware

Back
All Glassware
Wine Glasses
Pint Glasses


Disposable Cups
Ceramic Mugs
Pub Glasses & Cups
Coasters

Quick Links

Back
24 Hour Rush Products in Drinkware
Hot Products in Drinkware
New Products in Drinkware
Sale Products in Drinkware



Shop by Brand

Back
KOOZIE® Branded Products in Drinkware
Camelbak Branded Products in Drinkware
Contigo Branded Products in Drinkware
Blender Bottle Branded Products in Drinkware
Thermos Branded Products in Drinkware
Bubba Branded Products in Drinkware
Cool Gear Branded Products in Drinkware
Coleman Branded Products in Drinkware
Cutter & Buck Branded Products in Drinkware
Shop All Brands



Popular Products in Drinkware




Glacier Stainless Vacuum Travel Tumbler - 30 oz.
On sale from $9.99





















Full Color Pocket Coolie
95¢ to $1.59





















Mega Vortex Tumbler - 16 oz.
On sale from $2.99





















Mood Stadium Cup - 12 oz.
On sale from 37¢




















 

Food & Candy

All Categories
All Food & Candy
Candy
Individually Wrapped
Bags
Chocolate
Cookies
Candy Jars
Gum
Mints
Tins
Nuts & Pretzels
Gift Boxes & Baskets
Packaged with Gift
Popcorn
Water & Beverages
BBQ Gifts
Mixed Assortment
Cheese & Meats
Wine Gifts

Quick Links

Back
24 Hour Rush in Food & Candy
Hot Products in Food & Candy
New Products in Food & Candy
Sale Products in Food & Candy



Shop by Brand

Back
Hershey's Branded Food & Candy
Jelly Belly Branded Food & Candy
Life Savers Branded Food & Candy
M&M's Branded Food & Candy
Mike & Ike Branded Food & Candy
Skittles Branded Food & Candy
Swedish Fish Branded Food & Candy
Shop All Brands



Popular Products in Food & Candy




Flip Top Dispenser with Sugar-Free Mints
47¢ to 99¢





















7 Way Assortment Tin - Small
$17.75 to $28.49





















Business Card Chocolate Treat - Thank You
$1.79 to $3.15





















Personalized Candy - 1/2 oz. - Chewy Sprees
59¢ to 99¢




















 

Office & Awards

All Categories
All Office & Awards

Magnets

Back
All Magnets
Business Card Magnets
Magnet Clips
Magnet Shapes
Car & Auto Magnets



Stickers & Decals

Back
All Stickers & Decals
Bumper Stickers & Auto
Stickers & Decals By the Roll
Permanent Stickers & Decals
Removable Stickers & Decals



Awards & Recognition

Back
All Awards & Recognition
Awards & Trophies
Certificate Holders
Plaques
Paperweights



Desk Accessories

Back
All Desk Accessories
Clips & Memo Holders
Letter Openers



Stress Relievers

Back
All Stress Relievers
Sport Shapes


Business Card Holders
Picture Frames
Rulers
Clocks
Books & Bookmarks
Calculators
Watches

Quick Links

Back
24 Hour Rush Products in Stickers & Decals
Hot Products in Stickers & Decals
New Products in Stickers & Decals
Sale Products in Stickers & Decals



Popular Products in Office & Awards




Landscaped Starfire Glass Paperweight - Full Color
$26.75 to $34.95





















Letter Opener - Opaque
On sale from 37¢





















Smiley Face Mood Stress Ball
$1.43 to $2.35





















Aluminum Card Case
$1.89 to $3.59




















 

Outdoor & Leisure

All Categories
All Outdoor & Leisure

Umbrellas

Back
All Umbrellas
Folding Umbrellas
Auto Open Umbrellas
Golf Umbrellas



Team Spirit

Back
All Team Spirit
Tattoos
Cheer & Noisemakers
Stadium Cushions



Golf

Back
All Golf
Golf Balls
Golf Tees
Golf Towels



Towels

Back
All Towels
Beach Towels
Sport & Fitness Towels



Blankets

Back
All Blankets
Embroidered Blankets


Chairs
Sunglasses
Sports
BBQ & Picnic
Hand Fans

Quick Links

Back
24 Hour Rush Products in Outdoor & Leisure
Hot Products in Outdoor & Leisure
New Products in Outdoor & Leisure
Sale Productsin Outdoor & Leisure



Popular Products in Outdoor & Leisure




Risky Business Sunglasses - Opaque
$1.35 to $2.35





















ShedRain Super Mini 42" Umbrella
$4.59 to $8.35





















Roll-Up Blanket – Navy/White Plaid with Navy Flap
On sale from $9.50





















Microfiber Golf Towel
99¢ to $1.69




















 

Stationery

All Categories
All Stationery

Padfolios

Back
All Padfolios
Junior Padfolios
Standard Padfolios
Zippered Closure Padfolios
Leather Padfolios
Holds iPad or Tablet



Cubes, Pads & Flags

Back
All Cubes, Pads & Flags
Post-it® Notes
Bic® Sticky Notes
Notepads
Pad & Flag Sets



Calendars

Back
All Calendars
Wall Calendars
Peel n Stick Calendars
Desk Calendars
Calendar Magnets
Academic Calendars



Notebooks & Journals

Back
All Notebooks & Journals
Perfect Bound Notebooks & Journals
Spiral Bound Notebooks & Journals
Jotters


Marketing Materials

Planners & Diaries

Back
All Planners & Diaries
2017 Planners
Pocket Calendars


Presentation Folders
Packaging
Greeting Cards
Document Holders
Binders
Clipboards

Quick Links

Back
24 Hour Rush Products in Stationery
Hot Products in Stationery
New Products in Stationery
Sale Products in Stationery



Shop by Brand

Back
Moleskine Branded Products in Stationery
Cutter & Buck Branded Products in Stationery
Wenger Branded Products in Stationery
Cross Branded Products in Stationery
Shop All Brands



Popular Products in Stationery




Bic Sticky Note 3" x 3" - 25 Sheet
On sale from 24¢





















Basic Memo Book - Full Color
29¢ to 77¢





















Neoskin Journal - 6" x 4"
$3.49 to $5.99





















Pedova Jr. Zippered Padfolio
$7.75 to $12.49




















 

Technology

All Categories
All Technology
Power Banks
USB Flash Drives
Stylus Pens & Tools

Tech Accessories

Back
All Tech Accessories
Car & Wall Chargers
USB Charging Cables
Screen Cleaners
USB Hubs



Tech Friendly Bags

Back
All Tech Friendly Bags
Laptop Backpacks
Business Bags
TSA-Friendly Bags
Laptop & Tablet Sleeves



Music & Audio

Back
All Music & Audio
Ear Buds
Headphones
Portable Speakers
Bluetooth & Wireless



Cell Phone Accessories

Back
All Cell Phone Accessories
Phone Cases
Adhesive Phone Wallets
Phone Stands & Holders



Tech Cases & Organizers

Back
All Tech Cases & Organizers
Cord Wraps
Cord Cases
Small Device Pouches


Mouse Pads

Quick Links

Back
24 Hour Rush Products in Technology
Hot Products in Technology
New Products in Technology
Sale Products in Technology



Popular Products in Technology




Energize Portable Power Bank
$4.99 to $8.99





















Swing USB Drive - 2GB - 3 Day
$4.25 to $7.35





















3 in 1 Noodle Charging Cable
$1.75 to $3.15





















Spectra Ear Buds and Phone Stand
$1.45 to $2.49




















 

Toys & Novelties

All Categories
All Toys & Novelties

Childrens Toys

Back
All Childrens Toys
Banks
Paper Masks & Hats
Stuffed Animals



Novelty & Sport Balls

Back
All Novelty & Sport Balls
Beach Balls
Footballs



Coloring & Art

Back
All Coloring & Art
Activity Pads
Coloring Books
Crayons & Colored Pencils


Balloons
Flyers
Executive Toys
Noisemakers
Tattoos
Light Up Novelties

Quick Links

Back
24 Hour Rush Products in Toys & Novelties
Hot Products in Toys & Novelties
New Products in Toys & Novelties
Sale Products in Toys & Novelties



Popular Products in Toys & Novelties




Value Playing Cards with Case
99¢ to $1.89





















Big Paw Bear - Brown
$4.35 to $7.35





















Lil' Piggy Bank - Translucent
99¢ to $1.95





















Light-Up Yo-Yo
86¢ to $1.33




















 

Trade Show & Signage

All Categories
All Trade Show & Signage

Table Covers & Throws

Back
All Table Covers & Throws
4' Table Length Table Covers & Throws
6' Table Length Table Covers & Throws
8' Table Length Table Covers & Throws
Convertible Table Covers & Throws
Table Runners



Banners, Flags & Signs

Back
All Banners, Flags & Signs
Retractable Banners
Indoor Banners & Signs
Outdoor Banners & Signs



Lanyards & Badges

Back
All Lanyards & Badges
Lanyards
Retractable Badge Holders
Neck Wallets
Name Tags & Badges



Lanyard & ID Holder Accessories

Back
All Lanyard & ID Holder Accessories
Ribbons
Vinyl Badge/ID Holders
Lanyard Cards



Display Accessories

Back
All Display Accessories
Carry Cases for Display Accessories
Replacement Graphics Displays
Tables & Chairs



Food Service Supplies

Back
All Food Service Supplies
Napkins
Drinkware
Cup Sleeves


Table Top Displays
Trade Show Games
Floor Displays
Display Kits
Tents
Literature Displays
Giveaways

Quick Links

Back
24 Hour Rush Products in Trade Show & Signage
Hot Products in Trade Show & Signage
New Products in Trade Show & Signage
Sale Products in Trade Show & Signage



Popular Products in Trade Show & Signage




Value Indoor Banner - 3' x 4'
$24.00 to $73.00





















Briefcase Tabletop Display with Curved Header - 18" x 48"-FC
$399.00 to $495.00





















Economy Lanyard - 1/2" - Metal Bulldog Clip
84¢ to $2.20





















Prize Wheel with Soft Carry Case
$425.00 to $549.00




















 

Wellness & Safety

All Categories
All Wellness & Safety

Personal Care

Back
All Personal Care
Mirrors
Emery Boards & Manicure



First Aid

Back
All First Aid
Bandages
First Aid Kits
Hot/Cold Packs



Safety

Back
All Safety
Reflective Stickers & Lights



Healthcare

Back
All Healthcare
Pill Boxes


Hand Sanitizers
Fitness
Pedometers
Lip Balm
Sunscreen
Educational Guides
Awareness Bracelets
Buttons

Quick Links

Back
24 Hour Rush Products in Wellness & Safety
Hot Products in Wellness & Safety
New Products in Wellness & Safety
Sale Products in Wellness & Safety



Popular Products in Wellness & Safety




Bandage Dispenser - Opaque - Natural
45¢ to 79¢





















Silk Touch Performance Sport Polo - Men's
$10.95 to $24.95





















Emery Board - Zebra
16¢ to 25¢





















Round Reflector Light
89¢ to $1.64




















 

Writing

All Categories
All Writing

Pens

Back
All Pens
Value Pens
Gel Ink Pens
Novelty Pens



Pencils

Back
All Pencils
Standard Pencils
Mechanical Pencils
Novelty Pencils
Golf Pencils



Multi Function Writing

Back
All Multi Function Writing
Highlighter Pen Combos
Multi-Ink Pens



Writing Sets

Back
All Writing Sets
Pen & Pencil Sets


Executive Writing
Stylus Pens
Highlighters
Markers

Quick Links

Back
24 Hour Rush Products in Writing
Hot Products in Writing
New Products in Writing
Sale Productsin Writing



Shop by Brand

Back
Bic Branded Products in Writing
Paper Mate Branded Products in Writing
Sharpie Branded Products in Writing
Uni-Ball Branded Products in Writing
Shop All Brands



Popular Products in Writing




Wolverine Pen
On sale from 27¢





















Bic Brite Liner Grip
59¢ to 99¢





















MopTopper Stylus Pen
99¢ to $1.69





















Sharpie Mini Canister - Assorted Fashion Colors
$117.00 to $165.00




















 

See More

All Categories

4imprint Shops

Back to 4imprint Shops
4imprint Budget Savers4imprint FavoritesBasics - Marketing Staples That Work!Business GiftsChurch and Religious PromotionsColor Collection - Choose Items by ColorCommunity and Family ActivitiesGifts By PriceHome Ideas - Items Used Around the HouseHuman ResourcesItems By IndustryJust For FunLadies' and FashionPromotional Products for EducationPromotional Products for GovernmentPromotional Products for HealthcarePublic SafetyShapes - Apple, Star, Heart...Sports
See All Shops



4imprint Quick Links

Back to Quick Links
Hot Products
Sale Products
New Products
Price Drops
24hr Service
Exclusive Designs
USA Made
Product Reviews
Video Gallery



More Ways to Shop

Back to More Ways to Shop
Brands
Capacity
Eco Friendly
Helpful Links
Imprint Method
Material
Recycling Code
Size
Style
See All Categories


 






24 Hour Rush


Exclusive Items


Hot Products


New Products


On Sale


Go to our Outlet Site










Promotional Products by 4imprint





Andywith 4imprint10 years








No Worries,I've got this
Tight deadline? Looking for the perfect product? No problem! We're here to make it happen - and it's on-time or FREE.
Be Worry-Free








Erinwith 4imprint12 years








Want to be sure?Samples are the cure.
We're all about 'try before you buy'. Free samples make finding the perfect product perfectly simple!
Learn About Samples








Libbywith 4imprint7 years








Making you look good.That's my thing.
Need art modifcations, tweaks, adjustments – or even art from scratch? Our art pros have your back – for free!
Your Art Team








Sarawith 4imprint15 years








Magical MerchandiseI find it and bring it to you.
Your brand on the right product makes the magic happen. We've got that 'perfect product' you're looking for - including your favorite brand names.
Our Merchandising Magic








Staceywith 4imprint6 years








We know it's not just a productif it's got your logo on it.
You want to look good and you want your company to look good. We get that - and we've got a guarantee to back it up!
Why Buy From Us







Featured Promotional Product Categories








Shop All Promotional Business Apparel Products
Outfit your team with custom imprinted apparel!

Shop Apparel














Shop All Promotional Drinkware Products for Your Business
Save on custom personalized drinkware!

Shop Drinkware














Shop All Promotional Bags for Your Marketing Campaign
Bundle up your promotions with personalized bags!

Shop Bags














Shop All Giveaways Under $1 each
Giveaways under $1 to fit any promotional budget!

Shop Under $1














Shop All Promotional Trade Show & Signage Products for Your Event
Demand attention with logo'd trade show traffic-stoppers!

Shop Trade Show














Shop All Giveaway Items on Sale
Special prices, deals & steals on top promotional giveaways!

Shop Sale














Shop All Personalized Stationery Items
Customize your own folders, notepads, Post-it® Notes & more!

Shop Stationery














Shop All Imprinted Technology Products
Stay modern with logo'd computer accessories & electronics!

Shop Technology













Weekly Deal!Save up to 32%





Rockdale Lunch Cooler




As low as $1.89!

Shop the Rockdale 6-Pack Lunch Cooler Now 




















USB Flex Light
outlet price as low as $2.89
make an offer


Shop the Outlet Store now!







deal
of
the
day







more upcoming deals start soon!


Grab today's deal before it's gone!









Heidi, with4imprint18 years
Josh, with4imprint11 years




Embroidery Made Easy
The price you see is the price you pay!

No upcharge for extended sizes.
Order as few as 6 pieces.
$35 tape charge; FREE on orders of 24 pieces or more on polos, dress shirts & jackets!
No stitch counts - if your logo fits in the described embroidered area, there are no additional fees. Period.


Shop Embroidery Now 




Tanya, with4imprint11 years




ValueBuy

Hurry, quantities are limited!



Stretch your budget even further with incredible savings on our Collette Pen. Available in six eye-catching colors.


Shop The Collette Pen Now 




Cat, with 4imprint4 years




reFresh Brand

A drinkware brand only from 4imprint!
Bright colors, smart styling and great value! Perfect for everything from promoting wellness to getting your brand out there at summer events. Choose from six different styles, three different sizes and over 40 different color combinations. 

Shop reFresh Now 







Mary, with4imprint3 years



Mary Recommends


I do a lot of bike riding, and I log my minutes for our wellness program at 4imprint. This bottle makes a great companion!
Shop the O2COOL ArcticSqueeze Insulated Sport Bottle Now





Marcia, with4imprint4 years



Marcia Recommends


These are great for summer cookouts. Even I can cook and look like a pro!
Shop the Frosted Silicone Oven Mitt Now






#SwaggingRights Customer photos
Real life examples of how our products can help your promotional needs shine.






























































10 Popular Search Terms


Search for beer
165 products




Search for coasters
921 products




Search for coffee mugs
503 products




Search for fans
419 products




Search for flash drive
524 products




Search for koozie
139 products




Search for lanyard
1253 products




Search for sunglasses
232 products




Search for tote bags
1286 products




Search for usb
941 products





4imprint Information and Contact Links


Connect with Us











Need Help?
Call 1-877-446-7746


 Live Chat




 Email





Be in the Know
Sign up to be notified about the latest trends, products, and news.

Please enter a valid email address
Email address



Sign Up for 4imprint News


Thank you for signing up!

































Nations Financial Group | Independent Financial Advisor | Independent Broker Dealer | Nations Financial Group provides unbiased advice plus the strength and support of one of the top investment firms in America.












































Check the background of this financial professional on FINRA's BrokerCheck
X





Nations Financial Group | Independent Financial Advisor | Independent Broker Dealer

advisor login
investor Ebrokerage login







InvestorTrust. Integrity. Exceptional personal attention. Isn’t it time you worked with a financial advisor that delivers more?


AdvisorNations. A new breed of financial service firm.




























OneLogin







An important OneLogin update requires you to restart your browser.





















Email

Password





Forgot password

















Our Team | Nations Financial Group | Independent Financial Advisor | Independent Broker Dealer












































Check the background of this financial professional on FINRA's BrokerCheck
X





Nations Financial Group | Independent Financial Advisor | Independent Broker Dealer

advisor login

About Us
Our Team
Contact Us
Explore

Overview
Philosophy
Our Role


Grow

Overview
Advisory Services
Products


Run

Overview
Technology
Support


Protect

Overview


Transition

Overview
Your Move










Our team Experienced. Talented. Relationship-focused. Nations believes that culture helps drive success. Our leadership team takes great pride in our ability to provide “concierge” level service with one of the best support-to-representative ratios in the industry. But our team extends beyond the borders of our firm to our affiliated financial professionals who share a common goal of providing superior service to their clients.

Click on a photo to view biography.




 Scott Bennett | President & CEO




 Anne Brown | Trading & Risk Specialist




 Shelly Brecht | Administrative Assistant




 Les Miller | Director of Information Technology




 Jodi Cox | Commissions Manager




 Erik Bjorseth | Chief Growth Officer




 Tracey Krousie | Director of Operations




 Jordan Bennett | Chief Financial Officer/ Growth Manager




 Wilma Kell | Operations Specialist




 Stephen Cairney | Chief Operating Officer




 Matt Vawter | Trading & Risk Manager




 Carrie Wills | Operations Specialist




 Brian Wilkinson | Chief Compliance Officer/Integration Manager




 Jerri Bennett | Human Resources






To learn more about Nations Financial call 800-351-2471.


















Products & Services | Nations Financial Group | Independent Financial Advisor | Independent Broker Dealer












































Check the background of this financial professional on FINRA's BrokerCheck
X





Nations Financial Group | Independent Financial Advisor | Independent Broker Dealer

investor Ebrokerage login

Contact Us
About Us
Your Account
Products & Services








Click to access a demo account site


Wide Range of Products and Services
Advisors at Nations have access to a wide variety of both traditional and innovative financial services:

Asset-management accounts with unlimited check writing and ATM access
Online account access
Full range of retirement plans for individuals and businesses, and analysis to help you decide which ones are right for you
Traditional brokerage accounts
Variety of investment advisory options

Platform with access to over 1,000 institutional and boutique asset managers
Managed portfolio options
Numerous mutual fund and ETF wrap programs
Strategic and tactical asset allocation services
Quarterly performance reports available


Lending and personal trust services
Private credit line
Investment research from industry-leading research sources

 




















Products & Services | Nations Financial Group | Independent Financial Advisor | Independent Broker Dealer












































Check the background of this financial professional on FINRA's BrokerCheck
X





Nations Financial Group | Independent Financial Advisor | Independent Broker Dealer

investor Ebrokerage login

Contact Us
About Us
Your Account
Products & Services








Click to access a demo account site


Wide Range of Products and Services
Advisors at Nations have access to a wide variety of both traditional and innovative financial services:

Asset-management accounts with unlimited check writing and ATM access
Online account access
Full range of retirement plans for individuals and businesses, and analysis to help you decide which ones are right for you
Traditional brokerage accounts
Variety of investment advisory options

Platform with access to over 1,000 institutional and boutique asset managers
Managed portfolio options
Numerous mutual fund and ETF wrap programs
Strategic and tactical asset allocation services
Quarterly performance reports available


Lending and personal trust services
Private credit line
Investment research from industry-leading research sources

 













﻿































Nordstrom, Inc. (JWN) Expected to Announce Quarterly Sales of $3.72 Billion - Markets Daily













































 
























 




 





















Daily Ratings & News for Nordstrom Inc.
        	Complete the form below to receive the latest headlines and analysts' recommendationsfor Nordstrom Inc. with our free daily email newsletter:



 





Follow @TheMarketsDaily


The Markets Daily









Recent Posts

Nordstrom, Inc. (JWN) Expected to Announce Quarterly Sales of $3.72 Billion
Analysts Expect Paychex, Inc. (NASDAQ:PAYX) to Post $0.60 EPS
Cogeco Communications Inc (TSE:CCA) Expected to Earn FY2018 Earnings of $6.11 Per Share
BioDelivery Sciences International, Inc. Expected to Post FY2018 Earnings of ($0.72) Per Share (BDSI)
Royal Bank Of Canada Reaffirms “Buy” Rating for NCI Building Systems, Inc. (NCS)
CVR Partners, LP (NYSE:UAN) Raised to Hold at Zacks Investment Research
Diversified Trust Co Holds Stake in Northern Trust Corporation (NASDAQ:NTRS)
Prospera Financial Services Inc Acquires Shares of 7,070 Home Bancorp, Inc. (HBCP)
Bollard Group LLC Buys 3,038 Shares of Holly Energy Partners, L.P. (HEP)
Gradient Investments LLC Increases Position in PDC Energy, Inc. (PDCE)
Gradient Investments LLC Raises Position in Canon, Inc. (NYSE:CAJ)
Spirit of America Management Corp NY Has $788,000 Stake in EOG Resources, Inc. (NYSE:EOG)
Charter Trust Co. Reduces Position in Marathon Petroleum Corporation (NYSE:MPC)
Harman International Industries (NYSE:HAR) Receives News Sentiment Rating of 0.15
Whiting Petroleum Corporation (NYSE:WLL) Now Covered by Bank of America Corporation
$245.80 Million in Sales Expected for Multi-Color Corporation (LABL) This Quarter
Equities Analysts Offer Predictions for Datawatch Corporation’s FY2018 Earnings (DWCH)
LivePerson, Inc. (LPSN) EVP Dustin Dean Sells 2,400 Shares of Stock
Citizens Financial Group, Inc. (NYSE:CFG) Issues Quarterly  Earnings Results, Beats Expectations By $0.04 EPS
Lamb Weston Holdings Inc. (NYSE:LW) Announces $0.19 Quarterly Dividend




 


Nordstrom, Inc. (JWN) Expected to Announce Quarterly Sales of $3.72 Billion

					Posted by Michael Walen on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 




Wall Street analysts expect Nordstrom, Inc. (NYSE:JWN) to announce $3.72 billion in sales for the current fiscal quarter, according to Zacks. Four analysts have made estimates for Nordstrom’s earnings, with the lowest sales estimate coming in at $3.70 billion and the highest estimate coming in at $3.75 billion. Nordstrom posted sales of $3.65 billion in the same quarter last year, which suggests a positive year-over-year growth rate of 1.9%. The firm is expected to issue its next earnings results after the market closes  on Thursday, August 10th.
On average, analysts expect that Nordstrom will report full-year sales of $3.72 billion for the current financial year, with estimates ranging from $15.03 billion to $15.31 billion. For the next year, analysts forecast that the business will report sales of $15.48 billion per share, with estimates ranging from $15.27 billion to $15.78 billion. Zacks Investment Research’s sales calculations are an average based on a survey of sell-side analysts that that provide coverage for Nordstrom.


 Get Nordstrom Inc. alerts:



Several brokerages recently issued reports on JWN. Vetr cut Nordstrom from a “strong-buy” rating to a “buy” rating and set a $48.92 price objective for the company. in a report on Monday, April 10th. Piper Jaffray Companies  set a $42.00 target price on Nordstrom and gave the company a “hold” rating in a research note on Saturday, May 13th. Robert W. Baird  set a $50.00 target price on Nordstrom and gave the company a “hold” rating in a research note on Saturday, May 13th. ValuEngine lowered Nordstrom from a “buy” rating to a “hold” rating in a research note on Thursday, June 8th. Finally, Atlantic Securities raised Nordstrom from a “neutral” rating to an “overweight” rating and boosted their price target for the company from $45.00 to $58.00 in a research report on Thursday, May 4th. Five research analysts have rated the stock with a sell rating, eighteen have assigned  a hold rating and five have given a buy rating to the stock. The company presently has an average rating of “Hold” and a consensus price target of $47.23.




A number of institutional investors have recently modified their holdings of the stock. Parallel Advisors LLC raised its position in shares of  Nordstrom by 12.7% in the first quarter. Parallel Advisors LLC now owns 2,099 shares of the specialty retailer’s stock worth $104,000 after buying an additional 236 shares during the last quarter.  Gemmer Asset Management LLC raised its position in shares of  Nordstrom by 0.8% in the first quarter. Gemmer Asset Management LLC now owns 2,252 shares of the specialty retailer’s stock worth $105,000 after buying an additional 18 shares during the last quarter.  Ledyard National Bank raised its position in shares of  Nordstrom by 291.1% in the first quarter. Ledyard National Bank now owns 2,362 shares of the specialty retailer’s stock worth $110,000 after buying an additional 1,758 shares during the last quarter.  Advisory Services Network LLC purchased a new position in shares of  Nordstrom during the first quarter worth about $113,000.  Finally, NEXT Financial Group Inc raised its position in shares of  Nordstrom by 55.4% in the second quarter. NEXT Financial Group Inc now owns 2,642 shares of the specialty retailer’s stock worth $126,000 after buying an additional 942 shares during the last quarter. 64.07% of the stock is owned by hedge funds and other institutional investors. 
TRADEMARK VIOLATION NOTICE: “Nordstrom, Inc. (JWN) Expected to Announce Quarterly Sales of $3.72 Billion” was  posted by Markets Daily and is the property of of Markets Daily. If you are reading this piece on another site, it was illegally stolen and reposted in violation of US & international trademark and copyright laws. The original version of this piece can be read at https://www.themarketsdaily.com/2017/07/21/nordstrom-inc-jwn-expected-to-announce-quarterly-sales-of-3-72-billion.html. 
Shares of Nordstrom (JWN) traded up 0.435% during mid-day trading on Friday, reaching $47.305. 564,327 shares of the company traded hands. The firm has a 50 day moving average of $46.32 and a 200-day moving average of $45.28. Nordstrom has a 52 week low of $39.05 and a 52 week high of $62.82. The stock has a market capitalization of $7.86 billion, a PE ratio of 22.147 and a beta of 0.83. 
About Nordstrom
Nordstrom, Inc is a fashion specialty retailer in the United States. The Company’s segments include Retail and Credit. As of March 20, 2017, the Company operated 344 the United States stores located in 40 states as well as an e-commerce business. The Company also offers its customers a variety of payment products and services, including credit and debit cards.
Get a free copy of the Zacks research report on Nordstrom (JWN)
For more information about research offerings from Zacks Investment Research, visit Zacks.com






Receive News & Ratings for Nordstrom Inc. Daily - Enter your email address below to receive a concise daily summary of the latest news and analysts' ratings for Nordstrom Inc. and related companies with MarketBeat.com's FREE daily email newsletter.



 





























Latest News






Leave a Reply

Click here to cancel reply.




Name  (Required) 



Mail (will not be published)  (Required) 



Website

































































Zacks: Brokerages Expect NCI, Inc. (NCIT) to Announce $0.25 Earnings Per Share | Daily Political











































































Home
About/Contact
Columnists
Privacy Policy
























Headlines
Politics
Nation
World
Issues
Economy
Finance




















NCI Inc. - Get News & Ratings Daily

		Enter your email address below to get the latest news and analysts' ratings for NCI Inc. with our FREE daily email newsletter:



 






Follow DailyPolitical

 
 










Latest News



Western Union Company (The) (WU) Position Maintained by Bartlett & Co. LLC					

Nisa Investment Advisors LLC Sells 753 Shares of Western Digital Corporation (WDC)					

Glencore PLC’s (GLEN) “Hold” Rating Reiterated at Liberum Capital					

Analysts Anticipate Virtu Financial, Inc. (VIRT) Will Post Earnings of $0.17 Per Share					

INC Research Holdings (INCR) Earns Daily Media Sentiment Score of 0.24					

Entellus Medical, Inc. (ENTL) Rating Increased to Strong-Buy at BidaskClub					

Vetr Inc. Upgrades Whole Foods Market, Inc. (WFM) to “Buy”					

Advanced Accelerator Applications S.A. (AAAP) Lifted to “Buy” at BidaskClub					

Nisa Investment Advisors LLC Lowers Position in Charter Communications, Inc. (CHTR)					

Edwards Lifesciences Corporation (EW) Position Increased by Nisa Investment Advisors LLC					

Domino's Pizza Group PLC.’s (DOM) “Buy” Rating Reiterated at Peel Hunt					

Duff & Phelps Utilities Income (DNP) Earning Somewhat Positive News Coverage, Analysis Finds					

Foundation Resource Management Inc. Purchases Shares of 1,610,813 Teck Resources Ltd (TECK)					

PACCAR Inc. (PCAR) Position Raised by Marathon Asset Management LLP					

LS Investment Advisors LLC Sells 787 Shares of Nucor Corporation (NUE)					

Marathon Asset Management LLP Buys 142,147 Shares of Wolverine World Wide, Inc. (WWW)					

Transocean Ltd. (RIG) Shares Bought by Foundation Resource Management Inc.					

Cameco Corporation (CCJ) Stake Increased by Foundation Resource Management Inc.					

Clorox Company (The) (CLX) Shares Sold by LS Investment Advisors LLC					

LS Investment Advisors LLC Decreases Stake in Genuine Parts Company (GPC)					





 





						Zacks: Brokerages Expect NCI, Inc. (NCIT) to Announce $0.25 Earnings Per Share					

						 July 10th, 2017  - 0 comments - Filed Under -
 by Stacy Sanders 


							Filed Under: Consensus Rating Articles - Finance 







Tweet










Wall Street analysts expect NCI, Inc. (NASDAQ:NCIT) to post earnings per share (EPS) of $0.25 for the current quarter, Zacks Investment Research reports. Three analysts have made estimates for NCI’s earnings. NCI reported earnings per share of $0.23 during the same quarter last year, which would suggest a positive year over year growth rate of 8.7%. The company is scheduled to announce its next quarterly earnings results  on Wednesday, July 26th.
According to Zacks, analysts expect that NCI will report full-year earnings of $1.00 per share for the current fiscal year, with EPS estimates ranging from $1.00 to $1.01. For the next fiscal year, analysts anticipate that the firm will report earnings of $1.09 per share, with EPS estimates ranging from $1.05 to $1.15. Zacks Investment Research’s earnings per share calculations are a mean average based on a survey of sell-side research firms that that provide coverage for NCI.
NCI (NASDAQ:NCIT) last issued its quarterly earnings results on Tuesday, May 9th. The information technology services provider reported $0.25 earnings per share (EPS) for the quarter, beating the Zacks’ consensus estimate of $0.21 by $0.04. The firm had revenue of $78.75 million during the quarter, compared to the consensus estimate of $76.55 million. NCI had a return on equity of 11.73% and a net margin of 2.13%. 




A number of brokerages recently commented on NCIT. FBR & Co  reissued a “hold” rating and set a $11.00 price target on shares of NCI in a research note on Tuesday, April 4th. Cowen and Company  reissued a “buy” rating and set a $16.50 price target on shares of NCI in a research note on Monday, April 10th. Noble Financial  reissued a “hold” rating on shares of NCI in a research note on Thursday. Zacks Investment Research raised NCI from a “sell” rating to a “hold” rating in a research note on Saturday, May 13th. Finally, SunTrust Banks, Inc. lowered NCI from a “buy” rating to a “hold” rating and dropped their price target for the company from $24.00 to $20.00 in a research note on Monday, July 3rd. Four analysts have rated the stock with a hold rating and two have given a buy rating to the stock. The stock presently has an average rating of “Hold” and a consensus target price of $18.33.
COPYRIGHT VIOLATION NOTICE: “Zacks: Brokerages Expect NCI, Inc. (NCIT) to Announce $0.25 Earnings Per Share” was originally  published by Daily Political and is owned by of Daily Political. If you are reading this article on another site, it was copied illegally and republished in violation of US and international copyright & trademark laws. The correct version of this article can be read at https://www.dailypolitical.com/2017/07/10/zacks-brokerages-expect-nci-inc-ncit-to-announce-0-25-earnings-per-share.html. 
Shares of NCI (NASDAQ NCIT) remained flat at $19.95 during mid-day trading on Monday. 269,099 shares of the stock traded hands. NCI has a 12-month low of $10.98 and a 12-month high of $21.40. The firm has a market cap of $270.34 million, a P/E ratio of 44.63 and a beta of 1.05. The company’s 50 day moving average is $19.55 and its 200-day moving average is $15.41. 
Several large investors have recently bought and sold shares of the stock. LSV Asset Management raised its stake in  NCI by 5.7% in the first quarter. LSV Asset Management now owns 72,201 shares of the information technology services provider’s stock valued at $1,086,000 after buying an additional 3,903 shares during the last quarter.  Teachers Advisors LLC raised its stake in  NCI by 44.1% in the fourth quarter. Teachers Advisors LLC now owns 13,212 shares of the information technology services provider’s stock valued at $184,000 after buying an additional 4,044 shares during the last quarter.  Hancock Holding Co. bought a new stake in  NCI during the first quarter valued at about $189,000.  Renaissance Technologies LLC raised its stake in  NCI by 2.5% in the fourth quarter. Renaissance Technologies LLC now owns 384,725 shares of the information technology services provider’s stock valued at $5,367,000 after buying an additional 9,225 shares during the last quarter.  Finally, Globeflex Capital L P raised its stake in  NCI by 40.3% in the first quarter. Globeflex Capital L P now owns 40,372 shares of the information technology services provider’s stock valued at $608,000 after buying an additional 11,600 shares during the last quarter. 39.04% of the stock is owned by institutional investors and hedge funds. 
About NCI
NCI, Inc is a provider of enterprise services and solutions to defense, intelligence, healthcare and civilian government agencies. The Company provides information technology (IT), and professional services and solutions by leveraging its core service offerings, which include cloud computing and IT infrastructure optimization; cybersecurity and information assurance; engineering and logistics support; enterprise information management and advanced analytics; health IT and medical support; IT service management; modeling, simulation, and training, and agile development and integration.
Get a free copy of the Zacks research report on NCI (NCIT)
For more information about research offerings from Zacks Investment Research, visit Zacks.com





Receive News & Ratings for NCI Inc. Daily - Enter your email address below to receive a concise daily summary of the latest news and analysts' ratings for NCI Inc. and related companies with MarketBeat.com's FREE daily email newsletter.



 
















 Comment on this Post

Click here to cancel reply.



Name (required)

Mail (will not be published) (required)

Website






Wordpress Hashcash needs javascript to work, but your browser has javascript disabled. Your comment will be deleted!




Latest News




Jeff Sessions Spoke of Resigning After Tensions Increase with Trump





President Trump’s Tweets Complicate Already Complicated Week





World Leaders Very Critical of Paris Agreement Decision by Trump





Aide to President Trump Resigns With More Expected





Scud-Class Missile Launched by North Korea














			© DailyPolitical, LLC 2009-2017. All rights reserved. 


Privacy Policy |
			About | Columnists 
			| Contact 



























































Nordstrom (NYSE:JWN) Stock Price, News & Analysis | MarketBeat






















    























































































Nordstrom Company Profile (NYSE:JWN)



  






Company Profile



Analyst Ratings



Earnings History



Earnings Estimates



Dividend History



Insider Trade



Headlines



Social Media



Chart






About Nordstrom (NYSE:JWN)
Nordstrom, Inc. is a fashion specialty retailer in the United States. The Company's segments include Retail and Credit. As of March 20, 2017, the Company operated 344 the United States stores located in 40 states as well as an e-commerce business. The Company also offers its customers a variety of payment products and services, including credit and debit cards. As of March 20, 2017, the Retail segment included its 117 Nordstrom-branded full-line stores in the United States and Nordstrom.com, 216 off-price Nordstrom Rack stores, five Canada full-line stores, Nordstromrack.com/HauteLook, seven Trunk Club clubhouses and TrunkClub.com, two Jeffrey boutiques and two clearance stores that operate under the name Last Chance. The Company, through Credit segment, allows its customers to access a range of payment products and services, including a Nordstrom-branded private label card, approximately two Nordstrom-branded Visa credit cards and a debit card for Nordstrom purchases. 


Industry, Sector and Symbol:

Sector: Retail/Wholesale
Industry: Retail - Department Stores
Sub-Industry: Department Stores
Symbol: NYSE:JWN
CUSIP: 65566410
Web: www.nordstrom.com

Capitalization:Market Cap: $7.82105 billionOutstanding Shares: 166,052,000Average Prices:50 Day Moving Avg: $46.32200 Day Moving Avg: $45.2752 Week Range: $39.05 - $62.82


P/E:Trailing P/E Ratio: 22.21Foreward P/E Ratio: 15.97P/E Growth: 2.36Sales & Book Value:Annual Revenue: $14.86 billionPrice / Sales: 0.53Book Value: $4.08 per sharePrice / Book: 11.63Dividend:Annual Dividend: $1.48Dividend Yield: 3.1%


Profitability:EBIDTA: $1.7 billionNet Margins: 2.51%Return on Equity: 69.16%Return on Assets: 7.29%Debt:Debt-to-Equity Ratio: 4.03%Current Ratio: 1.01%Quick Ratio: 0.32%Misc:Average Volume: 3.08 million shs.Beta: 0.83Short Ratio: 8.24

 

Frequently Asked Questions for Nordstrom (NYSE:JWN)
What is Nordstrom's stock symbol?

Nordstrom trades on the New York Stock Exchange (NYSE) under the ticker symbol "JWN."



How often does Nordstrom pay dividends? What is the dividend yield for Nordstrom?

Nordstrom announced a quarterly dividend on Tuesday, May 16th. Shareholders of record on Friday, May 26th will be paid a dividend of $0.37 per share on Monday, June 12th. This represents a $1.48 annualized dividend and a yield of 3.12%. The ex-dividend date of this dividend is Wednesday, May 24th.  View Nordstrom's Dividend History.



How will Nordstrom's stock buyback program work?

Nordstrom announced that its board has authorized a share repurchase program on Sunday, April 9th 2017, which authorizes the company to repurchase $500,000,000.00 in  outstanding  shares, according to EventVestor. This repurchase authorization authorizes the company to repurchase up to 6.3% of its shares through open market purchases. Shares repurchase programs are generally an indication that the company's management believes its stock is undervalued. 



How were Nordstrom's earnings last quarter?

Nordstrom, Inc. (NYSE:JWN) announced its earnings results on Thursday, August, 11th. The company reported $0.67 EPS for the quarter, beating the Zacks' consensus estimate of $0.56 by $0.11. The company had revenue of $3.65 billion for the quarter, compared to analysts' expectations of $3.67 billion. Nordstrom had a return on equity of 69.16% and a net margin of 2.51%. The company's revenue was down .2% on a year-over-year basis. During the same quarter last year, the business earned $0.93 EPS.  View Nordstrom's Earnings History.



What guidance has Nordstrom issued on next quarter's earnings?

Nordstrom updated its FY18 earnings guidance on Thursday, May, 11th. The company provided earnings per share (EPS) guidance of $2.75-3.00 for the period, compared to the Thomson Reuters consensus estimate of $2.93. 



Where is Nordstrom's stock going? Where will Nordstrom's stock price be in 2017?

24 equities research analysts have issued 12 month price objectives for Nordstrom's shares. Their predictions range from $35.00 to $60.00. On average, they expect Nordstrom's stock price to reach $47.43 in the next year. View Analyst Ratings for Nordstrom.



What are analysts saying about Nordstrom stock?

Here are some recent quotes from research analysts about Nordstrom stock: 
1. Nomura analysts commented, "After the close yesterday, HAIN said it will publish results by end of May. The stock is up 5% pre-market. We continue to expect minimal revision to earnings, and think HAIN offers value at 18x our FY18 EPS estimates (which is 8% below consensus). Despite slowing, apparently, underlying top line trends, we see value." (5/12/2017)
2. According to Zacks Investment Research, "Nordstrom’s shares have outperformed the broader industry on a year to date basis, as the company has been gaining from its focus on enhancing customer experience and productivity. We also commend Nordstrom’s strong brand image, cost saving initiatives and store expansion efforts. Further, the company’s progress on its 2020 strategy bodes well. Estimates have been stable lately ahead of the company’s first-quarter results. Moreover, the company has a record of positive earnings surprises in recent quarters. However, the company’s presence in the consumer-driven apparel space, keeps the company exposed to the risks of changing tastes, preferences and spending behavior of consumers. Also, stiff competition from other players remains a threat to margins. Further, the seasonal nature of the company’s business may hurt results if any season fails to deliver." (5/10/2017)
3. Cowen and Company analysts commented, "JWN remains our favorite department store stock idea in a tough sector as full-price department store sectors/concepts (M, KSS, HBC, JCP) are experiencing share losses vs. off-price channel and Amazon; meanwhile, apparel continues to struggle to obtain healthy pricing trends as both fast fashion, deep-value fashion, and lack of dominant fashion trends hurts. We think sentiment and selling trends on the West Coast (45% of JWN's store base) could be volatile given volatility in technology stocks ' despite relatively solid S&P500 performance. We note that in the past 5 yrs, JWN has guided next year below Street an average of 6%. Elevated short interest could yield a short squeeze if results are better-than-feared, which would send the stock higher. Short Interest as a % of Float is ~21%." (2/13/2017)




Who are some of Nordstrom's key competitors?

 Some companies that are related to Nordstrom include Restaurant Brands International (QSR), AutoZone (AZO), Whole Foods Market (WFM), L Brands (LB), MercadoLibre (MELI), Fastenal Company (FAST), CarMax (KMX), Tiffany & Co. (TIF), Darden Restaurants (DRI), Liberty Interactive Corporation (QVCA), Domino's Pizza (DPZ), Chipotle Mexican Grill (CMG), Metro AG (MTTRY), Burberry Group PLC (BURBY), Gap, Inc. (The) (GPS), Kingfisher plc (KGFHY), IAC/InterActiveCorp (IAC) and Advance Auto Parts (AAP).



Who are Nordstrom's key executives?

Nordstrom's management team includes the folowing people: Blake W. Nordstrom, Co-President, DirectorErik B. Nordstrom, Co-President, DirectorPeter E. Nordstrom, Co-President, DirectorAnne L. Bramman, Chief Financial OfficerDaniel F. Little, Executive Vice President, Chief Information OfficerScott A. Meden, Executive Vice President, Chief Marketing OfficerRobert B. Sari, Executive Vice President, General Counsel, SecretaryChristine F. Deputy, Executive Vice President Human ResourcesKaren S. McKibbin, Executive Vice President and President, Nordstrom RackJames F. Nordstrom Jr., Executive Vice President and President – Stores



Who owns Nordstrom stock?

Nordstrom's stock is owned by a variety of of retail and institutional investors. Top institutional shareholders include 
				
					NORDSTROM BRUCE A
				
			 (15.50%), 
				
					NORDSTROM BRUCE A
				
			 (15.50%), 
				
					GITTINGER ANNE E
				
			 (9.30%), APG Asset Management N.V. (0.86%), Ardevora Asset Management LLP (0.38%) and Douglas Lane & Associates LLC (0.25%). Company insiders that own Nordstrom stock include Blake W Nordstrom, Daniel F Little, Enrique Hernandez Jr, Geevy Sk Thomas, Michael G Koppel, Peter E Nordstrom, Philip G Satre and Scott A Meden. View Institutional Ownership Trends for Nordstrom.



Who sold Nordstrom stock? Who is selling Nordstrom stock?

Nordstrom's stock was sold by a variety of institutional investors in the last quarter, including Gateway Investment Advisers LLC, Aperio Group LLC, US Bancorp DE, Creative Planning, Nisa Investment Advisors LLC, Exxonmobil Investment Management Inc. TX, New England Research & Management Inc. and Chevy Chase Trust Holdings Inc.. Company insiders that have sold Nordstrom stock in the last year include Blake W Nordstrom, Daniel F Little, Enrique Hernandez Jr, Michael G Koppel, Peter E Nordstrom and Scott A Meden. View Insider Buying and Selling for Nordstrom.



Who bought Nordstrom stock? Who is buying Nordstrom stock?

Nordstrom's stock was acquired by a variety of institutional investors in the last quarter, including Ardevora Asset Management LLP, Douglas Lane & Associates LLC, NN Investment Partners Holdings N.V., Mn Services Vermogensbeheer B.V., APG Asset Management N.V., Confluence Investment Management LLC, Centre Asset Management LLC and Visionary Asset Management Inc..  View Insider Buying and Selling for Nordstrom.



How do I buy Nordstrom stock? 

Shares of Nordstrom can be purchased through any online brokerage account. Popular online brokerages include Vanguard Brokerage Services, TD Ameritrade, E*TRADE, Scottrade, Fidelity and Charles Schwab. 



What is Nordstrom's stock price today?

One share of Nordstrom stock can currently be purchased for approximately $47.44.


MarketBeat Community Rating for Nordstrom (NYSE JWN)Community Ranking:  2.3 out of 5 ( )Outperform Votes:  576 (Vote Outperform)Underperform Votes:  662 (Vote Underperform)Total Votes:  1,238MarketBeat's community ratings are surveys of what our community members think about Nordstrom and other stocks. Vote "Outperform" if you believe the stock will outperform the S&P 500 over the long term. Vote "Underperform" if you believe the stock will underperform the S&P 500 over the long term. You may vote once every thirty days.


Analyst Ratings
Consensus Ratings for Nordstrom (NYSE:JWN) (How are Consensus Ratings Calculated?) MarketBeat calculates consensus ratings using the most recent rating from each brokerage that has rated a stock within the last twelve months. Since brokers often use different ratings systems, each rating is normalized to a standardized rating score of 1 (sell), 2 (hold), 3 (buy) or 4 (strong buy). Consensus ratings scores are calculated using the mean average of the number of normalized sell, hold, buy and strong buy ratings. Each stock's consensus rating is derived from its calculated consensus ratings score (0-1.5 = Sell, 1.5-2.5 = Hold, 2.5-3.5 = Buy, >3.5 = Strong Buy). MarketBeat's consensus price targets are a mean average of the most recent available price targets set by each analyst that has set a price target for the stock in the last twelve months.MarketBeat will no longer include ratings and price target data in its consensus calculation if a broker drops coverage and MarketBeat has received a report that coverage was dropped. Ratings from certain research firms that issue ratings using purely quantitative methods (such as Zacks, Vetr and ValuEngine) are not included in consensus calculations. MarketBeat's consensus ratings and consensus price targets may differ from those calculated by other firms due to differences in methodology and available data.Ratings Breakdown: 4 Sell Ratings, 15 Hold Ratings, 5 Buy RatingsConsensus Rating:Hold (Score: 2.04)Consensus Price Target: $47.43 (0.02% downside)

Analysts' Ratings History for Nordstrom (NYSE:JWN)

Show:  
Only the Most Recent Rating From Each Brokerage
All Ratings For This Stock


DateFirmActionRatingPrice TargetImpact on Share PriceDetails7/17/2017Piper Jaffray CompaniesSet Price TargetHold$42.00Medium7/14/2017J P Morgan Chase & CoReiterated RatingUnderweight$48.00Low6/19/2017Royal Bank Of CanadaSet Price TargetHold$45.00Low6/12/2017Credit Suisse Group AGReiterated RatingNeutral$52.00Low6/9/2017Cowen and CompanyReiterated RatingOutperform$49.00Low6/9/2017Gordon HaskettReiterated RatingAccumulateLow6/9/2017GuggenheimReiterated RatingBuy -> NeutralHigh5/16/2017Northcoast ResearchReiterated RatingNeutralLow5/13/2017BMO Capital MarketsSet Price TargetHold$50.00 -> $48.00Low5/13/2017Robert W. BairdSet Price TargetHold$50.00Low5/14/2017InstinetReiterated RatingNeutral$44.00 -> $42.00Low5/12/2017Citigroup Inc.Lower Price TargetNeutral$50.00 -> $46.00High5/12/2017NomuraReiterated RatingHold$42.00High5/12/2017Maxim GroupLower Price TargetBuy -> Buy$61.00 -> $56.00High5/4/2017Atlantic SecuritiesUpgradeNeutral -> Overweight$45.00 -> $58.00Medium2/24/2017Telsey Advisory GroupLower Price TargetMarket Perform -> Market Perform$52.00 -> $50.00N/A2/10/2017Susquehanna Bancshares IncInitiated CoverageNeutral$47.00 -> $47.00N/A2/6/2017William BlairReiterated RatingOutperformN/A2/2/2017Goldman Sachs Group, Inc. (The)DowngradeNeutral -> Sell$35.00N/A1/17/2017Stifel NicolausDowngradeBuy -> Hold$62.00 -> $40.00N/A11/11/2016Bank of America CorporationSet Price TargetSell$40.00N/A11/11/2016KeyCorpReiterated RatingBuyN/A10/31/2016Deutsche Bank AGDowngradeBuy -> Hold$57.00 -> $56.00N/A8/15/2016Morgan StanleyReiterated RatingUnderweight$34.00 -> $36.00N/A7/5/2016Miller TabakUpgradeSell -> Hold$30.00 -> $39.50N/A6/13/2016ArgusReiterated RatingHoldN/A5/31/2016Buckingham ResearchReiterated RatingReduce$47.00N/A5/16/2016Wolfe ResearchLower Price TargetUnderperform$43.00 -> $34.00N/A5/14/2016Sterne Agee CRTReiterated RatingHoldN/A5/13/2016Topeka Capital MarketsLower Price TargetBuy$69.00 -> $50.00N/A4/29/2016Cleveland ResearchDowngradeBuy -> NeutralN/A4/22/2016Evercore ISIDowngradeHold -> Sell$50.00 -> $40.00N/A2/20/2016Brean CapitalReiterated RatingHoldN/A2/2/2016Barclays PLCLower Price TargetUnderweight$45.00 -> $42.00N/A1/12/2016LebenthalReiterated RatingHoldN/A8/14/2015MacquarieReiterated RatingNeutral$73.00 -> $82.00N/A(Data available from 7/22/2015 forward)


Earnings
Earnings History for Nordstrom (NYSE:JWN)Earnings History by Quarter for Nordstrom (NYSE JWN)DateQuarterConsensus EstimateActual EPSRevenue EstimateActual RevenueRelease LinkConference CallDetails2/23/2017Q416$1.15$1.37$4.36 billion$4.24 billionViewListen11/10/2016Q316$0.52$0.84$3.49 billion$3.47 billionViewListen8/11/2016Q216$0.56$0.67$3.67 billion$3.65 billionViewListen5/12/2016Q116$0.46$0.26$3.28 billion$3.19 billionViewListen2/18/2016Q415$1.22$1.17$4.23 billion$4.14 billionViewListen11/12/2015Q315$0.72$0.57$3.38 billion$3.20 billionViewListen8/13/2015Q215$0.90$0.93$3.67 million$3.60 millionViewListen5/14/2015Q115$0.71$0.66$3.15 billion$3.12 billionViewListen2/19/2015Q414$1.35$1.32$4.01 billion$3.90 billionViewListen11/13/2014Q314$0.71$0.73$3.10 billion$3.04 billionViewListen8/14/2014Q214$0.94$0.95$3.39 billion$3.30 billionViewListen5/15/2014Q114$0.68$0.72$2.86 billion$2.84 billionViewListen2/20/2014Q413$1.34$1.34$3.72 billion$3.71 billionViewListen11/14/2013Q313$0.66$0.66$2.87 billion$2.88 billionViewListen8/15/2013Q2 2013$0.88$0.93$3.29 billion$3.20 billionViewListen2/21/2013Q4 2012$1.34$1.40$3.70 million$3.60 billionViewListen11/8/2012Q312$0.72$0.71$2.72 billion$2.71 billionViewN/A8/9/2012$0.74$0.75ViewN/A5/10/2012$0.75$0.70ViewN/A2/16/2012$1.10$1.11ViewN/A11/10/2011$0.58$0.59ViewN/A8/11/2011$0.74$0.80ViewN/A5/12/2011$0.67$0.65ViewN/A2/17/2011$1.00$1.04ViewN/A(Data available from 1/1/2011 forward)


Estimates
Earnings Estimates for Nordstrom (NYSE:JWN)2017 EPS Consensus Estimate: $3.802018 EPS Consensus Estimate: $2.81QuarterNumber of EstimatesLow EstimateHigh EstimateAverage EstimateQ1 20175$1.35$1.56$1.43Q2 20172$0.57$0.60$0.59Q3 20173$0.47$0.70$0.56Q4 20173$1.13$1.31$1.22Q1 20183$0.25$0.30$0.27Q2 20183$0.60$0.62$0.61Q3 20182$0.64$0.64$0.64Q4 20183$1.26$1.31$1.29(Data provided by Zacks Investment Research)


Dividends
Current Dividend Information for Nordstrom (NYSE:JWN)Most Recent Dividend:6/12/2017Annual Dividend:$1.48Dividend Yield:3.12%Dividend Growth:7.20% (3 Year Average)Payout Ratio:69.48% (Trailing 12 Months of Earnings)  49.83% (Based on This Year's Estimates)49.83% (Based on Next Year's Estimates)Dividend History by Quarter for Nordstrom (NYSE JWN)AnnouncedPeriodAmountYieldEx-Dividend DateRecord DatePayable Date5/16/2017quarterly$0.373.63%5/24/20175/26/20176/12/20172/17/2017quarterly$0.373.23%2/27/20173/1/20173/15/201711/16/2016quarterly$0.372.53%11/23/201611/28/201612/13/20168/17/2016quarterly$0.372.84%8/25/20168/29/20169/13/20165/19/2016quarterly$0.373.88%5/26/20165/31/20166/15/20162/24/2016quarterly$0.372.82%3/3/20163/7/20163/22/201611/18/2015quarterly$0.372.66%11/25/201511/30/201512/15/201510/1/2015$4.8510/7/201510/12/201510/27/20158/19/2015quarterly$0.371.9%8/27/20158/31/20159/15/20155/5/2015quarterly$0.371.96%5/27/20155/29/20156/12/20152/13/2015quarterly$0.371.88%2/25/20152/27/20153/13/201511/19/2014quarterly$0.331.76%11/26/201412/1/201412/15/20148/20/2014quarterly$0.331.91%8/28/20149/2/20149/17/20145/7/2014quarterly$0.332.15%5/28/20145/30/20146/13/20142/26/2014quarterly$0.332.15%3/6/20143/10/20143/25/201411/20/2013quarterly$0.301.93%11/27/201312/2/201312/16/20138/21/2013quarterly$0.302.1%8/29/20139/3/20139/16/20135/14/2013quarterly$0.301.95%5/29/20135/31/20136/17/20132/27/2013quarterly$0.302.21%3/7/20133/11/20133/22/2013(Data available from 1/1/2013 forward)


Insider Trades
Insider Trading and Institutional Ownership History for Nordstrom (NYSE:JWN)Insider Ownership Percentage: 7.03%Institutional Ownership Percentage: 64.07%Insider Trades by Quarter for Nordstrom (NYSE:JWN)Transaction DateInsider NameTitleBuy/SellNumber of SharesAverage Share PriceTotal TransactionDetails4/3/2017Daniel F LittleInsiderSell7,423$47.01$348,955.23  3/13/2017Blake W NordstromPresidentSell3,169$43.80$138,802.20  3/10/2017Peter E NordstromInsiderSell3,297$44.75$147,540.75  3/6/2017Blake W NordstromPresidentSell1,905$45.08$85,877.40  3/3/2017Peter E NordstromInsiderSell1,981$46.86$92,829.66  2/27/2017Blake W NordstromPresidentSell1,558$47.50$74,005.00  12/13/2016Michael G KoppelInsiderSell87,257$58.34$5,090,573.38  12/12/2016Daniel F LittleInsiderSell19,704$59.62$1,174,752.48  12/7/2016Scott A. MedenInsiderSell5,000$60.00$300,000.00  11/23/2016Enrique Hernandez JrDirectorSell24,534$58.38$1,432,294.92  11/14/2016Blake W. NordstromPresidentSell42,847$60.00$2,570,820.00  10/7/2016Daniel F LittleInsiderSell5,277$55.00$290,235.00  10/6/2016Daniel F LittleInsiderSell5,270$54.00$284,580.00  10/5/2016Daniel F. LittleInsiderSell12,770$53.00$676,810.00  9/23/2016Daniel F LittleInsiderSell5,270$52.00$274,040.00  4/4/2016Geevy Sk ThomasEVPSell155$57.10$8,850.50  3/21/2016Geevy Sk ThomasEVPSell2,834$57.81$163,833.54  3/16/2016Michael G KoppelEVPSell38,073$56.56$2,153,408.88  3/4/2016Blake W NordstromPresidentSell1,904$54.35$103,482.40  2/24/2016Blake W NordstromPresidentSell1,557$50.69$78,924.33  11/23/2015Philip G SatreDirectorBuy17,600$56.89$1,001,264.00  6/23/2015Daniel F LittleEVPSell20,539$76.00$1,560,964.00  3/30/2015Michael G KoppelEVPSell53,878$80.07$4,314,011.46  3/24/2015Ken WorzelEVPSell54,581$81.93$4,471,821.33  3/23/2015Daniel F LittleEVPSell20,539$82.00$1,684,198.00  3/20/2015Erik B NordstromEVPSell31,531$81.76$2,577,974.56  3/19/2015Alison A WinterDirectorSell13,598$80.75$1,098,038.50  3/16/2015Peter E NordstromEVPSell31,531$80.22$2,529,416.82  3/3/2015Blake W NordstromPresidentSell1,778$80.10$142,417.80  3/3/2015Peter E NordstromEVPSell1,850$80.55$149,017.50  1/5/2015James A HowellVPSell42,961$77.29$3,320,455.69  12/16/2014Geevy Sk ThomasEVPSell4,000$75.27$301,080.00  12/15/2014Alison A WinterDirectorSell3,000$74.75$224,250.00  12/9/2014Daniel F LittleEVPSell11,375$74.00$841,750.00  10/3/2014Robert SariVPSell6,000$70.00$420,000.00  7/9/2014Blake W NordstromPresidentSell67,502$70.00$4,725,140.00  6/6/2014Daniel F LittleEVPSell11,000$68.45$752,950.00  5/16/2014James Nordstrom, Jr.EVPSell9,480$66.75$632,790.00  5/12/2014Peter NordstromEVPSell40,984$62.82$2,574,614.88  5/2/2014Erik NordstromEVPSell40,984$62.20$2,549,204.80  4/3/2014James Nordstrom, Jr.EVPSell11,802$64.00$755,328.00  3/25/2014David WitmanEVPSell13,824$62.38$862,341.12  3/19/2014Delena SundayEVPSell51,912$62.35$3,236,713.20  3/17/2014Geevy Sk ThomasEVPSell19,544$62.09$1,213,486.96  3/4/2014Robert MiddlemasEVPSell10,000$61.59$615,900.00  12/20/2013Daniel LittleEVPSell22,458$61.19$1,374,205.02  12/6/2013Mark TrittonEVPSell7,900$61.39$484,981.00  11/26/2013Scott MedenEVPSell15,533$63.00$978,579.00  9/18/2013Margaret MyersEVPSell8,670$58.25$505,027.50  9/16/2013Delena SundayEVPSell30,576$58.00$1,773,408.00  7/8/2013James F Nordstrom JrEVPSell28,519$63.00$1,796,697.00  7/5/2013Blake W NordstromPresidentSell80,522$61.60$4,960,155.20  7/5/2013James A HowellVPSell20,220$61.66$1,246,765.20  6/13/2013David M WitmanEVPSell12,219$59.36$725,319.84  6/7/2013Daniel F LittleEVPSell37,384$59.13$2,210,515.92  5/28/2013David M WitmanEVPSell15,660$60.23$943,201.80  5/28/2013Enrique Hernandez JrDirectorSell8,007$60.00$480,420.00  5/21/2013Teri BariquitEVPSell3,625$61.00$221,125.00  5/13/2013Peter E NordstromEVPSell46,012$59.56$2,740,474.72  3/25/2013Robert Ernst CampbellVPSell10,536$53.44$563,043.84  9/5/2012David M WitmanEVPSell8,130$57.08$464,060.40  9/4/2012Erik B NordstromEVPSell31,148$57.64$1,795,370.72  (Data available from 1/1/2013 forward)


Headlines
Headline Trends for Nordstrom (NYSE:JWN)


Latest Headlines for Nordstrom (NYSE:JWN)


Source:


All Sources
Trusted Sources
MarketBeat.com
Bloomberg
MarketWatch
Motley Fool
NASDAQ
Reuters
Seeking Alpha
The Street
The Wall Street Journal
Yahoo Finance




DateHeadlineNordstrom, Inc. (JWN) Expected to Announce Quarterly Sales of $3.72 Billionwww.americanbankingnews.com - July 21 at 3:52 PMNordstrom, Inc. (NYSE:JWN) Receives Average Rating of "Hold" from Brokerageswww.americanbankingnews.com - July 21 at 9:12 AMComparing Nordstrom (NYSE:JWN) & Dillard's (DDS)www.americanbankingnews.com - July 21 at 8:04 AMNordstrom: A Safe Harbour - Seeking Alphaseekingalpha.com - July 20 at 6:35 AMNordstrom, Inc. (JWN) Expected to Post Earnings of $0.61 Per Sharewww.americanbankingnews.com - July 19 at 6:28 PMStarting This Friday! The Nordstrom One-Of-A-Kind Anniversary Salefinance.yahoo.com - July 18 at 5:11 AMAnalyzing Nordstrom (NYSE:JWN) and Kohl's Corporation (KSS)www.americanbankingnews.com - July 17 at 11:28 AMAre Nordstrom (JWN) Expansion Plans Just Plain Nuts?investorplace.com - July 17 at 7:55 AMToo Negative on Retail?; Metrics and Netflix: Jim Cramer's Viewfinance.yahoo.com - July 17 at 1:31 AMNordstrom Just Had a Horrible Meeting With Top Stock Analystfinance.yahoo.com - July 15 at 3:50 AMAn army of women posing in Ivanka Trump clothes are spurring a social media crazefinance.yahoo.com - July 15 at 3:50 AMNordstrom, Inc. (JWN) Given "Underweight" Rating at J P Morgan Chase & Cowww.americanbankingnews.com - July 14 at 4:20 PMNordstrom (JWN) on Expansion Spree, Peers Curb Store Countfinance.yahoo.com - July 14 at 5:20 AMCramer: Perhaps We've Gotten Too Negative on Retail?finance.yahoo.com - July 14 at 5:20 AMNordstrom's website is crashing on one of the retailer's biggest shopping days of the yearwww.businessinsider.com - July 13 at 6:34 PMNordstrom's website skips out on Anniversary Sale eventseekingalpha.com - July 13 at 5:29 PMNordstrom website crashes during anniversary salemarketbeat.com - July 13 at 3:17 PMNordstrom Rack To Open At The Promenade At Town Center In Santa Clarita, Californiafinance.yahoo.com - July 13 at 5:32 AMFormer employee sues Nordstrom's Trunk Club, alleges he was forced to work without payfinance.yahoo.com - July 12 at 1:08 AMHead to Head Contrast: Nordstrom (NYSE:JWN) & Dillard's (DDS)www.americanbankingnews.com - July 11 at 7:36 AMWhy Nordstrom, Inc. Stock Gained 14% Last Monthfinance.yahoo.com - July 7 at 6:42 AMNordstrom, Inc. (JWN) Cut to "Strong Sell" at Vetr Inc.www.americanbankingnews.com - July 6 at 12:26 AMNordstrom, Inc. (NYSE:JWN) Closing More Stores – Who’s Next?investorplace.com - July 5 at 8:12 AMJWN Makes Bullish Cross Above Critical Moving Averagewww.nasdaq.com - July 3 at 7:37 PMNordstrom (JWN) to Close Store Amid Department Store Woesfinance.yahoo.com - July 3 at 7:37 PMNordstrom signals it won't stick around at failing mallswww.bizjournals.com - July 1 at 7:33 PMNordstrom's latest store closure signals retailer's shift from failing mallswww.bizjournals.com - July 1 at 2:20 AMNordstrom To Close Store At Dulles Town Center Mall In Dulles, Virginiafinance.yahoo.com - June 30 at 9:19 PM​Nordstrom to close D.C.-area department storefinance.yahoo.com - June 30 at 9:19 PMUpdated: Cambia Health Solutions Elects New Chairman of the Board and Welcomes Three New Board Membersfeeds.benzinga.com - June 30 at 2:45 PMNordstrom Launches Pop-Up Tech Shop Replicating The Inside Of A Computerfinance.yahoo.com - June 28 at 7:41 PMAn obscure accounting change could boost Amazon, Starbucks, Wal-Mart profits by hundreds of millions of dollarsfinance.yahoo.com - June 28 at 7:41 PMRussell Wilson, Ashley Graham, Taye Diggs And More Team Up With Nordstrom To Celebrate The Retailer's One-Of-A-Kind Anniversary Salefinance.yahoo.com - June 26 at 8:00 PMNordstrom, Inc. (JWN) Receives Average Rating of "Hold" from Brokerageswww.americanbankingnews.com - June 26 at 9:02 AM2 Theories for Why Nordstrom May Go Privatewww.fool.com - June 25 at 6:28 PM$3.72 Billion in Sales Expected for Nordstrom, Inc. (JWN) This Quarterwww.americanbankingnews.com - June 25 at 8:58 AMNordstrom (JWN) to Open Second Rack Store in Milwaukee Areafinance.yahoo.com - June 23 at 11:30 PMCan the Nordstrom Family Afford to Take the Company Private?www.fool.com - June 23 at 9:40 PM$0.61 EPS Expected for Nordstrom, Inc. (JWN) This Quarterwww.americanbankingnews.com - June 23 at 2:36 PMRetail Deal Mania Continues With Whole Foods and Nordstromwww.fool.com - June 22 at 3:19 PMNordstrom family moving to find private equity partner: C...finance.yahoo.com - June 22 at 12:50 PMNordstrom Rack To Open At Bayshore Town Center In Glendale, Wisconsinfinance.yahoo.com - June 22 at 12:49 PMRetailers want to work out your wallet _ and your bodyfinance.yahoo.com - June 22 at 12:49 PMNordstrom Stock Rising as Family Pursues Private Equity Buyerfinance.yahoo.com - June 22 at 12:49 PMNordstrom Rack to open at Bayshore Town Center in fall 2018finance.yahoo.com - June 22 at 12:49 PMWalmart Gears Up Anti-Amazon Stance in Wake of Whole Foods Dealfinance.yahoo.com - June 21 at 3:51 PMShould Nordstrom Go Private?www.fool.com - June 21 at 1:37 PMWalmart’s Efforts to Slow Down Amazon in Fashion Retailfinance.yahoo.com - June 20 at 7:03 PMAmazon launches 'try-before-you-buy' fashion servicefinance.yahoo.com - June 20 at 7:03 PMPrime Wardrobe: Is This How Amazon Kills Macy's In Fashion Game?finance.yahoo.com - June 20 at 7:03 PM


Social





Chart
Nordstrom (JWN) Chart for Saturday, July, 22, 2017




This page was last updated on 7/22/2017 by MarketBeat.com Staff












































﻿

























Nations Financial Group Inc. IA ADV Holds Stake in Waste Management, Inc. (NYSE:WM) - BNB Daily





































 
















 

 













Daily Ratings & News for Waste Management Inc.
Complete the form below to receive the latest headlines and analysts' recommendationsfor Waste Management Inc. with our free daily email newsletter:



 




Follow @bnbdailynews





Recent Posts

UBS Oconnor LLC Raises Stake in Southwestern Energy Company (NYSE:SWN)
Columbia Partners L L C Investment Management Cuts Stake in American Axle & Manufacturing Holdings, Inc. (NYSE:AXL)
Community Trust Bancorp, Inc. (CTBI) Stake Held by Swiss National Bank
China Telecom Corp (NYSE:CHA) Receiving Positive Media Coverage, Study Finds
Collegium Pharmaceutical (NASDAQ:COLL) Earning Favorable Press Coverage, Accern Reports
Comerica Bank Invests $216,000 in Herbalife LTD. (HLF)
FBL Financial Group, Inc. (FFG) Shares Bought by Swiss National Bank
ENI S.p.A. (NYSE:E) Given Coverage Optimism Rating of 0.03
Delcath Systems (NASDAQ:DCTH) Getting Positive Media Coverage, Report Finds
Comerica Bank Buys Shares of 3,805 Veeva Systems Inc (VEEV)
Benjamin F. Edwards & Company Inc. Increases Stake in Colgate-Palmolive Company (CL)
CVR Energy Inc. (NYSE:CVI) Given Consensus Recommendation of “” by Analysts
Silver Bay Realty Trust Corp (SBY) Position Maintained by Swiss National Bank
Gamco Investors INC. ET AL Boosts Stake in Costco Wholesale Corporation (NASDAQ:COST)
UBS Asset Management Americas Inc. Reduces Stake in Alaska Air Group, Inc. (ALK)
Banco De Chile (BCH) Stake Maintained by UBS Asset Management Americas Inc.
B2Gold Corp (NYSE:BTG) Stake Cut by UBS Asset Management Americas Inc.
Chemical Financial Corporation (CHFC) Receives $55.00 Consensus Price Target from Analysts
$1.24 Billion in Sales Expected for Post Holdings, Inc. (POST) This Quarter
Brokerages Anticipate ResMed Inc. (NYSE:RMD) to Post $0.75 EPS


 


Nations Financial Group Inc. IA ADV Holds Stake in Waste Management, Inc. (NYSE:WM)

Posted by Vince Mercandetti on Jul 16th, 2017 // No Comments 

Nations Financial Group Inc. IA ADV held its stake in shares of Waste Management, Inc. (NYSE:WM) during the first quarter, Holdings Channel reports. The firm owned 3,430 shares of the business services provider’s stock at the end of the first quarter. Nations Financial Group Inc. IA ADV’s holdings in Waste Management were worth $250,000 as of its most recent SEC filing. 
Other large investors have also made changes to their positions in the company. Quadrant Capital Group LLC increased its stake in shares of Waste Management by 5.8% in the first quarter. Quadrant Capital Group LLC now owns 1,424 shares of the business services provider’s stock worth $100,000 after buying an additional 78 shares in the last quarter. Signature Estate & Investment Advisors LLC acquired a new stake in shares of Waste Management during the first quarter worth $127,000. Pinnacle Bank acquired a new stake in shares of Waste Management during the first quarter worth $131,000. Hudock Capital Group LLC increased its stake in shares of Waste Management by 18.0% in the first quarter. Hudock Capital Group LLC now owns 2,048 shares of the business services provider’s stock worth $149,000 after buying an additional 312 shares in the last quarter. Finally, Shepherd Financial Partners LLC acquired a new stake in shares of Waste Management during the first quarter worth $201,000. 75.06% of the stock is owned by institutional investors and hedge funds. 




Waste Management, Inc. (WM) opened at 74.27 on Friday. Waste Management, Inc. has a 1-year low of $61.08 and a 1-year high of $74.58. The firm has a market capitalization of $32.82 billion, a price-to-earnings ratio of 27.10 and a beta of 0.71. The firm’s 50-day moving average is $72.70 and its 200-day moving average is $71.94. 


 Get Waste Management Inc. alerts:



Waste Management (NYSE:WM) last announced its earnings results on Wednesday, April 26th. The business services provider reported $0.66 earnings per share (EPS) for the quarter, hitting analysts’ consensus estimates of $0.66. The business had revenue of $3.44 billion during the quarter, compared to analysts’ expectations of $3.33 billion. Waste Management had a net margin of 8.81% and a return on equity of 24.76%. The firm’s revenue for the quarter was up 8.3% on a year-over-year basis. During the same quarter last year, the company posted $0.58 EPS. On average, equities analysts anticipate that Waste Management, Inc. will post $3.18 EPS for the current year. 
The company also recently announced a quarterly dividend, which was paid on Friday, June 23rd. Investors of record on Friday, June 9th were given a dividend of $0.425 per share. This represents a $1.70 dividend on an annualized basis and a dividend yield of 2.29%. The ex-dividend date of this dividend was Wednesday, June 7th. Waste Management’s dividend payout ratio (DPR) is currently 62.04%. 
TRADEMARK VIOLATION NOTICE: This news story was first posted by BNB Daily and is owned by of BNB Daily. If you are accessing this news story on another website, it was stolen and reposted in violation of U.S. & international trademark and copyright legislation. The correct version of this news story can be read at https://www.baseball-news-blog.com/2017/07/16/nations-financial-group-inc-ia-adv-holds-stake-in-waste-management-inc-nysewm.html. 
A number of equities research analysts recently weighed in on the stock. Zacks Investment Research downgraded shares of Waste Management from a “buy” rating to a “hold” rating in a research report on Wednesday, May 31st. KeyCorp boosted their price objective on shares of Waste Management from $50.00 to $65.00 and gave the company an “overweight” rating in a research report on Thursday, May 11th. Finally, Credit Suisse Group boosted their price objective on shares of Waste Management from $80.00 to $85.00 and gave the company an “outperform” rating in a research report on Wednesday, June 28th. One equities research analyst has rated the stock with a sell rating, six have issued a hold rating and seven have assigned a buy rating to the company’s stock. Waste Management presently has an average rating of “Hold” and a consensus price target of $74.08.
In related news, CEO James C. Fish, Jr. sold 3,500 shares of the stock in a transaction dated Tuesday, May 30th. The shares were sold at an average price of $72.19, for a total transaction of $252,665.00. Following the completion of the sale, the chief executive officer now owns 151,162 shares in the company, valued at approximately $10,912,384.78. The sale was disclosed in a filing with the Securities & Exchange Commission, which is available at the SEC website. Also, SVP Barry H. Caldwell sold 8,142 shares of the stock in a transaction dated Friday, April 21st. The stock was sold at an average price of $73.52, for a total transaction of $598,599.84. Following the sale, the senior vice president now owns 35,916 shares of the company’s stock, valued at approximately $2,640,544.32. The disclosure for this sale can be found here. Insiders have sold a total of 15,142 shares of company stock valued at $1,104,140 in the last quarter. 0.19% of the stock is currently owned by corporate insiders. 
Waste Management Company Profile
Waste Management, Inc (WM) is a holding company. The Company, through its subsidiaries, is a provider of waste management environmental services. The Company’s segments include Solid Waste and Other. The Company’s Solid Waste segment includes its solid waste business. The Other segment includes its Strategic Business Solutions (WMSBS) organization; its landfill gas-to-energy operations and third-party subcontract and administration services managed by its Energy and Environmental Services and WM Renewable Energy organizations; its recycling brokerage services, and its service offerings and solutions, such as portable self-storage and long distance moving services, fluorescent lamp recycling and interests it holds in oil and gas producing properties. 
Want to see what other hedge funds are holding WM? Visit HoldingsChannel.com to get the latest 13F filings and insider trades for Waste Management, Inc. (NYSE:WM).

 
Receive News & Ratings for Waste Management Inc. Daily - Enter your email address below to receive a concise daily summary of the latest news and analysts' ratings for Waste Management Inc. and related companies with MarketBeat.com's FREE daily email newsletter.



 





















Latest News




Leave a Reply

Click here to cancel reply.




Name (Required) 



Mail (will not be published) (Required) 



Website






 




























﻿

























American Electric Power Company, Inc. (AEP) Shares Sold by Nations Financial Group Inc. IA ADV - BNB Daily





































 
















 

 













Daily Ratings & News for American Electric Power Company Inc.
Complete the form below to receive the latest headlines and analysts' recommendationsfor American Electric Power Company Inc. with our free daily email newsletter:



 




Follow @bnbdailynews





Recent Posts

Stock Yards Bank & Trust Co. Has $503,000 Position in O’Reilly Automotive, Inc. (NASDAQ:ORLY)
Cimpress N.V (CMPR) & LSC Communications (NASDAQ:LKSD) Head to Head Survey
Head-To-Head Comparison: Avnet (AVT) and Uni-Pixel (NASDAQ:UNXL)
Castle Brands (ROX) versus Diageo PLC (NYSE:DEO) Head to Head Analysis
Analyzing The York Water (NASDAQ:YORW) and Aqua America (WTR)
Reviewing Granite Construction (NYSE:GVA) and Empresas ICA SAB de CV (ICA)
easyJet plc (EZJ) Given Buy Rating at Beaufort Securities
Transdigm Group (NYSE:TDG) Earning Somewhat Favorable News Coverage, Report Finds
Britvic Plc’s (BVIC) Neutral Rating Reaffirmed at J P Morgan Chase & Co
WM Morrison Supermarkets PLC (MRW) Stock Rating Reaffirmed by Deutsche Bank AG
Energy Focus (NASDAQ:EFOI) Earns News Impact Rating of 0.18
Meggitt plc’s (MGGT) Hold Rating Reaffirmed at Deutsche Bank AG
DWS Municiple Income Trust (KTF) Declares Monthly Dividend of $0.06
Bridge Bancorp, Inc. (BDGE) Plans $0.23 Quarterly Dividend
Cordasco Financial Network Sells 3,497 Shares of Microchip Technology Incorporated (NASDAQ:MCHP)
Cordasco Financial Network Has $254,000 Stake in F5 Networks, Inc. (NASDAQ:FFIV)
Factory Mutual Insurance Co. Sells 11,000 Shares of Lennar Corporation (LEN)
Capital Asset Advisory Services LLC Sells 470 Shares of IMPINJ Inc (PI)
Cordasco Financial Network Has $105,000 Stake in Leggett & Platt, Incorporated (NYSE:LEG)
Factory Mutual Insurance Co. Sells 113,440 Shares of Envision Healthcare Corporation (EVHC)


 


American Electric Power Company, Inc. (AEP) Shares Sold by Nations Financial Group Inc. IA ADV

Posted by Dan Jones on Jul 19th, 2017 // No Comments 

Nations Financial Group Inc. IA ADV cut its position in American Electric Power Company, Inc. (NYSE:AEP) by 5.3% during the first quarter, according to its most recent disclosure with the Securities and Exchange Commission. The institutional investor owned 3,392 shares of the utilities provider’s stock after selling 191 shares during the period. Nations Financial Group Inc. IA ADV’s holdings in American Electric Power were worth $228,000 as of its most recent filing with the SEC. 
Other hedge funds have also recently made changes to their positions in the company. Chicago Partners Investment Group LLC increased its stake in shares of American Electric Power by 0.3% in the first quarter. Chicago Partners Investment Group LLC now owns 1,599 shares of the utilities provider’s stock worth $107,000 after buying an additional 5 shares in the last quarter. Sowell Financial Services LLC purchased a new stake in shares of American Electric Power during the fourth quarter worth approximately $113,000. Thompson Davis & CO. Inc. increased its stake in shares of American Electric Power by 0.3% in the first quarter. Thompson Davis & CO. Inc. now owns 1,741 shares of the utilities provider’s stock worth $117,000 after buying an additional 6 shares in the last quarter. Kistler Tiffany Companies LLC increased its stake in shares of American Electric Power by 19.8% in the first quarter. Kistler Tiffany Companies LLC now owns 2,028 shares of the utilities provider’s stock worth $136,000 after buying an additional 335 shares in the last quarter. Finally, Advisory Services Network LLC purchased a new stake in shares of American Electric Power during the first quarter worth approximately $168,000. Institutional investors own 70.50% of the company’s stock. 




Shares of American Electric Power Company, Inc. (NYSE:AEP) opened at 68.36 on Wednesday. The company’s 50-day moving average price is $70.76 and its 200-day moving average price is $67.27. American Electric Power Company, Inc. has a 12-month low of $57.89 and a 12-month high of $72.97. The firm has a market capitalization of $33.61 billion, a PE ratio of 47.94 and a beta of 0.30. 


 Get American Electric Power Company Inc. alerts:



American Electric Power (NYSE:AEP) last announced its quarterly earnings data on Thursday, April 27th. The utilities provider reported $0.96 EPS for the quarter, missing the consensus estimate of $0.97 by $0.01. American Electric Power had a net margin of 4.31% and a return on equity of 10.78%. The firm had revenue of $3.90 billion for the quarter, compared to analyst estimates of $3.85 billion. During the same quarter in the prior year, the firm earned $1.02 earnings per share. The firm’s revenue for the quarter was down 2.5% on a year-over-year basis. Analysts anticipate that American Electric Power Company, Inc. will post $3.66 EPS for the current year. 
WARNING: “American Electric Power Company, Inc. (AEP) Shares Sold by Nations Financial Group Inc. IA ADV” was posted by BNB Daily and is owned by of BNB Daily. If you are accessing this article on another domain, it was illegally copied and republished in violation of international trademark & copyright law. The legal version of this article can be accessed at https://www.baseball-news-blog.com/2017/07/19/nations-financial-group-inc-ia-adv-has-228000-stake-in-american-electric-power-company-inc-aep-updated.html. 
A number of analysts have commented on AEP shares. Mizuho reiterated a “buy” rating and issued a $72.50 price objective on shares of American Electric Power in a research report on Wednesday, April 19th. Deutsche Bank AG raised their price objective on American Electric Power from $70.00 to $72.00 and gave the stock a “buy” rating in a research report on Tuesday, April 11th. BidaskClub downgraded American Electric Power from a “strong-buy” rating to a “buy” rating in a research report on Tuesday, June 13th. Morgan Stanley reiterated an “equal weight” rating on shares of American Electric Power in a research report on Monday, July 10th. Finally, Jefferies Group LLC reiterated a “hold” rating and issued a $70.00 price objective on shares of American Electric Power in a research report on Wednesday. Two investment analysts have rated the stock with a sell rating, eight have issued a hold rating and seven have issued a buy rating to the company. The company presently has a consensus rating of “Hold” and a consensus target price of $71.73.
In other American Electric Power news, insider Paul Chodak III sold 1,110 shares of the business’s stock in a transaction that occurred on Tuesday, May 16th. The shares were sold at an average price of $68.20, for a total transaction of $75,702.00. The sale was disclosed in a filing with the Securities & Exchange Commission, which is available through this link. 0.15% of the stock is owned by insiders. 
About American Electric Power
American Electric Power Company, Inc (AEP) is a public utility holding company that owns, directly or indirectly, all of the outstanding common stock of its public utility subsidiaries and varying percentages of other subsidiaries. The service areas of the Company’s public utility subsidiaries cover the states of Arkansas, Indiana, Kentucky, Louisiana, Michigan, Ohio, Oklahoma, Tennessee, Texas, Virginia and West Virginia. 

 
Receive News & Ratings for American Electric Power Company Inc. Daily - Enter your email address below to receive a concise daily summary of the latest news and analysts' ratings for American Electric Power Company Inc. and related companies with MarketBeat.com's FREE daily email newsletter.



 





















Latest News




Leave a Reply

Click here to cancel reply.




Name (Required) 



Mail (will not be published) (Required) 



Website






 





































 






Nations Financial Group - Investment Advisor - Cedar Rapids, Iowa







 








 






  zexdxzfwvayawcrvcvyxddddsavqrbbr






					Financial Advisors				

					Online Brokers				



				More 





 Search






							Investment Advisors							×














 
















Menu


See All Investment Advisors
OverviewFirm RegistrationAssets and AccountsClient TypesActivities and FeesBroker Dealer InfoEmployeesDisclosuresContact 








					Nations Financial Group, Inc.				


OverviewFirm RegistrationAssets and AccountsMoreClient TypesActivities and FeesBroker Dealer InfoEmployeesDisclosuresContact 








Nations Financial Group, Inc.



Overview




Firm Registration




Assets and Accounts




Client Types




Activities and Fees




Broker Dealer Info




Employees




Disclosures




Contact




References










 See all Investment Advisors				

 Guide				




Share



















Nations Financial Group Cedar Rapids, Iowa

 






total assets under management$962M United States Dollarstotal number of employees56total number of accounts3974average account balance$242,166 United States Dollars 

 

Claim This Listing 5-Star Rated Advisors 












Advertisement


ShareOverviewNations Financial Group, Inc. is a registered investment advisory firm located in Cedar Rapids, Iowa. The firm manages 3,974 accounts totaling an estimated $962,366,551 USD in assets under management. Its operations include 56 employees and is categorized as providing investment advisory services to 2,106 clients. Many more details can be found below. You can also click here to see a list of all 18 investment advisors located in Cedar Rapids, Iowa.
Firm data current as of May 15, 2017

 





Advertisement


ShareFirm RegistrationRegistration Details

Firm CRD #:44181Primary Business Name:Nations Financial Group, Inc.


Organization Type:Corporation


Regulator:SEC
Looking for a specific type of Investment Advisor? Check out the Investment Advisors homepage where you can apply custom filters to search through our database of 38,476 Registered Investment Advisors. For example, click the button below to view all advisors in Iowa, or set the filter for a specific city.See all Investment Advisors  in Iowa  >>State Registrations MapDates and StatusMoreState Registrations Map



Dates and Status

State RegulatorRegistration DateStatusIDUnique IdArkansasMarch 2, 2012Notice FiledArizonaMarch 2, 2012Notice FiledCaliforniaSeptember 1, 2004Notice FiledColoradoNovember 20, 2000Notice FiledFloridaJune 14, 2005Notice FiledIowaJuly 13, 2000Notice FiledIdahoMarch 19, 2007Notice FiledIllinoisAugust 14, 1998Notice FiledIndianaDecember 14, 2015Notice FiledKansasMay 28, 2003Notice FiledKentuckyApril 28, 2006Notice FiledMarylandMarch 2, 2012Notice FiledMichiganMarch 28, 2016Notice FiledMinnesotaJanuary 26, 2005Notice FiledMissouriApril 30, 2001Notice FiledNorth CarolinaNovember 2, 2012Notice FiledNebraskaFebruary 1, 2008Notice FiledNew JerseyNovember 7, 2007Notice FiledNew MexicoApril 23, 2013Notice FiledNevadaFebruary 28, 2017Notice FiledNew YorkDecember 14, 2015Notice FiledOhioMarch 28, 2016Notice FiledOklahomaFebruary 28, 2017Notice FiledOregonDecember 6, 2005Notice FiledPennsylvaniaDecember 14, 2015Notice FiledTexasJune 6, 1998Notice FiledVirginiaSeptember 5, 2000Notice FiledWashingtonDecember 6, 2005Notice FiledWisconsinAugust 19, 2003Notice Filed

 





Advertisement


ShareAssets and AccountsCurrent Assets & AccountsAssets under management (AUM) is the primary metric used to compare one investment advisory firm to another. With an impressive $962,366,551 USD in AUM, Nations Financial Group is still considered a medium size firm, with assets below the esteemed one billion level. Click here to view a list of other similar-sized firms with AUM above $500 Million.discretionary assets under management$541,683,058 United States Dollarsnon-discretionary assets under management$420,683,493 United States Dollarstotal assets under management$962M United States Dollarsdiscretionary accounts2184non-discretionary accounts1790total number of accounts3974Visit the Investment Advisors homepage to sort and filter firms based on assets under management >>Historical Assets & Accounts

Historical data is made available by the United States Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC) and is posted monthly on the Freedom of Information Act (FOIA) section of the SEC's website. The following graphs illustrate the 89 months of historical data available for this firm.

Total AUMBreakdownMoreTotal AUM

SEC Report DateTotal Assets Under Management (AUM)IDFirm CRD #May 1, 2017$962M United States DollarsApril 3, 2017$962M United States DollarsMarch 1, 2017$962M United States DollarsAugust 3, 2015$636M United States DollarsApril 1, 2015$636M United States DollarsMay 1, 2015$636M United States DollarsJune 1, 2015$636M United States DollarsJuly 1, 2015$636M United States DollarsSeptember 1, 2015$636M United States DollarsOctober 1, 2015$636M United States DollarsNovember 2, 2015$636M United States DollarsDecember 1, 2015$636M United States DollarsJanuary 4, 2016$636M United States DollarsFebruary 1, 2016$636M United States DollarsMarch 1, 2016$636M United States Dollars

Breakdown

SEC Report DateDiscretionary AUMNon-discretionary AUMIDFirm CRD #May 1, 2017$542M United States Dollars$421M United States DollarsApril 3, 2017$542M United States Dollars$421M United States DollarsMarch 1, 2017$542M United States Dollars$421M United States DollarsAugust 3, 2015$500M United States Dollars$136M United States DollarsApril 1, 2015$500M United States Dollars$136M United States DollarsMay 1, 2015$500M United States Dollars$136M United States DollarsJune 1, 2015$500M United States Dollars$136M United States DollarsJuly 1, 2015$500M United States Dollars$136M United States DollarsSeptember 1, 2015$500M United States Dollars$136M United States DollarsOctober 1, 2015$500M United States Dollars$136M United States DollarsNovember 2, 2015$500M United States Dollars$136M United States DollarsDecember 1, 2015$500M United States Dollars$136M United States DollarsJanuary 4, 2016$500M United States Dollars$136M United States DollarsFebruary 1, 2016$500M United States Dollars$136M United States DollarsMarch 1, 2016$500M United States Dollars$136M United States Dollars

AccountsBreakdownMoreAccounts

SEC Report DateTotal Number of AccountsIDFirm CRD #May 1, 20173974April 3, 20173974March 1, 20173974October 1, 20142715March 2, 20152715February 2, 20152715January 2, 20152715December 1, 20142715November 3, 20142715September 2, 20142715August 1, 20142715July 1, 20142715June 2, 20142715May 1, 20142715April 1, 20142715

Breakdown

SEC Report DateDiscretionary AccountsNon-discretionary AccountsIDFirm CRD #April 1, 20142225490March 2, 20152225490February 2, 20152225490January 2, 20152225490December 1, 20142225490November 3, 20142225490October 1, 20142225490August 1, 20142225490July 1, 20142225490June 2, 20142225490May 1, 20142225490September 2, 20142225490June 1, 20152192469July 1, 20152192469August 3, 20152192469

 

 


Credio is a finance site that uses Graphiq’s semantic technology to deliver deep insights via data-driven articles, visualizations and research tools.


										Deep insights from finance data. Knowledge delivered. ›
									









ShareClient TypesTypes of Clients Served



IndividualsHigh Net Worth IndividualsPension and Profit Sharing PlansCharitiesCorporations or Other BusinessesFirm CRD #IDIA Firm Name63.5 percent18.5 percent6 percent6 percent6 percent44181







Assets Attributed to Each Client Type

IndividualsHigh Net Worth IndividualsPension and Profit Sharing PlansCharitiesCorporations or Other BusinessesCompany NameIDIA Firm Name63 percent13 percent13 percent13 percent13 percentNations Financial Group


The SEC Form ADV organizes client types into 13 categories. Nations Financial Group reports working with 5 of these 13 client types. The firm reports serving a total of 2,106 clients and 10 financial planning clients.If you're looking for a particular type of Advisor, you can click the button below and use the filters to select a list a Investment Advisors based on types of clients served.Select Investment Advisors by  types of clients  >> 





Advertisement


ShareActivities and FeesAreas of BusinessAdvisory Activities and Services:Financial PlanningIndividuals or Small BusinessesPortfolio Management for Businesses or Institutional ClientsPension ConsultingSelection of Other AdvisorsWrap Fee ProgramSecurity PortfoliosOther Advisory Services: NoCompensationAdvisory Fees:Percentage of assetsFixed feesOther Fee Types: NoClick here to select Investment Advisors based on types of fees charged >> 

 







ShareBroker Dealer Info


In addition to it's investment advisory business, this advisor is employed by a firm that also participates in certain broker dealer activities involving the purchase and sale of securities. More details about the 12 types of brokerage activities can be found below.years in business19 yearstotal disclosures2




Securities Sales
Corporate Debt Securities, Life Insurance & Annuities, Mutual Funds, Over-The-Counter Corporate Equity Securities, and Primary Tax Shelters


Other Activities
Investment Advisory Services





Market Making
Put and Call Options, Government Securities Dealer, and Municipal Securities Broker


Underwriting & Syndication
Private Placements, Bank Company Transactions, and Corporate Securities Underwriter

More detailed information about Nations Financial Group, Inc. can be found on Credio's Broker Dealers website, which has unique data on 4,282 FINRA registered brokerage firms.See all  Brokerage Firms  >>zexdxzfwvayawcrvcvyxddddsavqrbbr







Advertisement


ShareEmployeesBy Categorytotal number of employees56investment adviser representatives10licensed insurance agents46broker-dealer registered reps54Representatives at Nations Financial Group

NameYears LicensedFinancial Exams PassedTotal DisclosuresIDJohn Storms46 yearsSeries 1, Series 24 (FINRA), Series 63 (NASAA), Series 82Richard Bennett39 yearsSeries 24 (FINRA), Series 27 (FINRA), Series 3 (NFA), Series 4 (FINRA), Series 53 (MSRB), Series 63 (NASAA), Series 65 - (NASAA), Series 7 (FINRA)0Charles Radloff37 yearsSeries 22 (FINRA), Series 24 (FINRA), Series 6 (FINRA), Series 62 (FINRA), Series 63 (NASAA), Series 7 (FINRA)0Matthew Tarnow37 yearsSeries 22 (FINRA), Series 24 (FINRA), Series 6 (FINRA), Series 63 (NASAA), Series 7 (FINRA)0Roger Ellerhoff34 yearsSeries 22 (FINRA), Series 6 (FINRA), Series 63 (NASAA), Series 66 - (NASAA), Series 7 (FINRA)0William Shepard34 yearsSeries 24 (FINRA), Series 3 (NFA), Series 6 (FINRA), Series 63 (NASAA), Series 66 - (NASAA), Series 7 (FINRA)0John Plotner34 yearsSeries 6 (FINRA), Series 63 (NASAA), Series 65 - (NASAA), Series 7 (FINRA)0Bruce Allen32 yearsSeries 24 (FINRA), Series 3 (NFA), Series 63 (NASAA), Series 65 - (NASAA), Series 7 (FINRA)1Robert Russell29 yearsSeries 24 (FINRA), Series 3 (NFA), Series 63 (NASAA), Series 65 - (NASAA), Series 7 (FINRA)0Jude Milbert27 yearsSeries 6 (FINRA), Series 63 (NASAA)0David Coiner27 yearsSeries 63 (NASAA), Series 7 (FINRA)0Rochelle Henry Ernberger25 yearsSeries 63 (NASAA), Series 65 - (NASAA), Series 7 (FINRA)0Dennis Zeto24 yearsSeries 24 (FINRA), Series 6 (FINRA), Series 63 (NASAA), Series 66 - (NASAA), Series 7 (FINRA)0Anne Sechler24 yearsSeries 63 (NASAA), Series 65 - (NASAA), Series 7 (FINRA)0Matthew Vawter23 yearsSeries 24 (FINRA), Series 4 (FINRA), Series 55 (FINRA), Series 63 (NASAA), Series 66 - (NASAA), Series 7 (FINRA)0Nicolle Landwehr21 yearsSeries 24 (FINRA), Series 63 (NASAA), Series 65 - (NASAA), Series 7 (FINRA)0Max Conde20 yearsSeries 63 (NASAA), Series 66 - (NASAA), Series 7 (FINRA)2Jon Wych18 yearsSeries 6 (FINRA), Series 63 (NASAA), Series 66 - (NASAA), Series 7 (FINRA)1Brent Hoffman18 yearsSeries 63 (NASAA), Series 66 - (NASAA), Series 7 (FINRA)2Michael Kehoe17 yearsSeries 63 (NASAA), Series 7 (FINRA)0Gregory Neumeyer17 yearsSeries 10 (FINRA), Series 63 (NASAA), Series 65 - (NASAA), Series 7 (FINRA), Series 9 (FINRA)0Erik Bjorseth15 yearsSeries 24 (FINRA), Series 4 (FINRA), Series 53 (MSRB), Series 55 (FINRA), Series 63 (NASAA), Series 66 - (NASAA), Series 7 (FINRA)0Michelle Blenderman15 yearsSeries 66 - (NASAA), Series 7 (FINRA)0Sharon Mathews12 yearsSeries 63 (NASAA), Series 7 (FINRA)0Martha Mccurry12 yearsSeries 66 - (NASAA), Series 7 (FINRA)0Greg Martin11 yearsSeries 65 - (NASAA)0Charlene Barak10 yearsSeries 28 (FINRA)0Jordan Bennett7 yearsSeries 24 (FINRA), Series 66 - (NASAA), Series 7 (FINRA)0Leslie Miller6 yearsSeries 24 (FINRA), Series 66 - (NASAA), Series 7 (FINRA)0Bradley Zwanziger3 yearsSeries 65 - (NASAA)1


The largest firm in our database has 39,343 employees. Other firms report having no employees at all. On the Investment Advisors homepage you can sort and filter firms by number of employees, or select other advanced criteria.Select Investment Advisors by  number of employees  >> ShareDisclosuresPublic Disclosure Statements as Reported on Form ADVThe SEC keeps track of disclosures for the 24 categories listed below. With zero reported disclosures, Nations Financial Group has a perfect record. On the research topic home page you can view a pre-sorted list of all investment advisory firms with zero disclosures.Regulatory Criminal False Statements or Omissions to SEC or CFTCNoneFelony ChargesNoneSEC or CFTC ViolationsNoneFelony ConvictionsNoneBusiness Suspensions, Restrictions, or RevocationsNoneMisdemeanor ChargesNoneSEC or CFTC Entered an Order Against AdvisorNoneMisdemeanor ConvictionsNoneCivil Money Penalty or Cease and Desist OrdersNone  False Statements or Omissions to Other RegulatorNoneCivil Violations of Regulations or StatutesNoneEnjoinments with Domestic or Foreign CourtsNoneRestrictions or Denials of BusinessNoneViolations of Investment-Related StatutesNoneRegulator Entered Orders Against AdvisorNoneCivil Action Dismissed by a Settlement AgreementNoneDenials or Suspensions of RegistrationNoneSubject to Any Civil ProceedingNoneFalse Statements or Omissions to Self-Reg. OrgNone  Violation of Regulatory RulesNoneOther Associated with Any Business SuspensionsNoneAny Professional Authorization RevokedNoneMembership Suspensions or ExpulsionsNoneSubject to Any Regulatory ProceedingNone


View a complete list of all Investment Advisory Firms in our database >>zexdxzfwvayawcrvcvyxddddsavqrbbr ShareContact InfoPrincipal Office

Main Office Phone
(319) 393-9541


Main Office Fax
319-393-3903


Main Office Address
4000 River Ridge Drive NeCedar Rapids,  Iowa 52402-7534United States


Email
http://investment-advisors.credio.com/l/23398/Nations-Financial-Group-Inc


Website
nationsfg.com 
Still searching for the right advisor? Try the Investment Advisors homepage, where you can sort and filter 40,118 Registered Investment Advisors by fee type, advisory services, location and more. You can click the button below to view all Advisors in Cedar Rapids, or set the filter for more advanced specific criteria.See all Investment Advisors  in Cedar Rapids  >>  


×






References




Sources: SEC and FINRA. Show details  Hide details  







Was this page helpful?

Yes
No


 

BlkHol Email


Welcome to 
Hi! We see you would like to submit a rating. Please login or create an account to do so. Thank you!


Sign In With




Login with Google




Login with Facebook
 We'll never post without your permission.



Don't have an account?
Sign Up Now




Privacy
Terms & Conditions









						© 2017 Graphiq Inc. All Rights Reserved.
						
Support
Terms
Privacy
Ad Choices and Cookie Policy










 
 




 

﻿































Anheuser Busch Inbev NV (NYSE:BUD) Upgraded to Buy by Zacks Investment Research - Markets Daily













































 
























 




 





















Daily Ratings & News for Anheuser Busch Inbev NV
        	Complete the form below to receive the latest headlines and analysts' recommendationsfor Anheuser Busch Inbev NV with our free daily email newsletter:



 





Follow @TheMarketsDaily


The Markets Daily









Recent Posts

Kite Realty Group Trust (NYSE:KRG) Position Raised by State Street Corp
Anheuser Busch Inbev NV (NYSE:BUD) Upgraded to Buy by Zacks Investment Research
Research Analysts Set Expectations for CBOE Holdings, Inc.’s FY2017 Earnings (CBOE)
Phillips 66 Partners LP (NYSE:PSXP) PT Lowered to $60.00
Q4 2017 EPS Estimates for Allergan PLC. Raised by Analyst (NYSE:AGN)
Pfizer, Inc. (PFE) Shares Sold by ProShare Advisors LLC
Macerich Company (The) (NYSE:MAC) Shares Sold by Paloma Partners Management Co
Capstone Asset Management Co. Sells 445 Shares of Autodesk, Inc. (ADSK)
Fulton Bank N.A. Acquires 2,083 Shares of GlaxoSmithKline PLC (NYSE:GSK)
National Pension Service Acquires 32,427 Shares of CA Inc. (CA)
Apartment Investment and Management Company (AIV) Position Cut by Spirit of America Management Corp NY
33,430 Shares in IHS Markit Ltd. (INFO) Acquired by Tealwood Asset Management Inc.
Financial Comparison: KLA-Tencor Corporation (KLAC) versus Teradyne (TER)
Simulations Plus, Inc. to Issue Quarterly Dividend of $0.05 (SLP)
Blueknight Energy Partners L.P., L.L.C. Announces Quarterly Dividend of $0.15 (NASDAQ:BKEP)
Buckingham Research Reiterates Buy Rating for PVH Corp. (NYSE:PVH)
Regency Centers Corporation (NYSE:REG) Given New $71.00 Price Target at Barclays PLC
K2M Group Holdings, Inc. (NASDAQ:KTWO) Stock Rating Reaffirmed by Cowen and Company
ValuEngine Downgrades Flagstar Bancorp, Inc. (FBC) to Hold
Radius Health, Inc. (RDUS) Given a $65.00 Price Target at Cantor Fitzgerald




 


Anheuser Busch Inbev NV (NYSE:BUD) Upgraded to Buy by Zacks Investment Research

					Posted by Kim Johansen on Jul 19th, 2017 // No Comments 




Anheuser Busch Inbev NV (NYSE:BUD) was upgraded by Zacks Investment Research from a “hold” rating to a “buy” rating in a note issued to investors on Wednesday. The brokerage currently has a $128.00 price objective on the consumer goods maker’s stock. Zacks Investment Research‘s price target suggests a potential upside of 11.80% from the company’s current price. 
According to Zacks, “AB InBev’s shares have outperformed the broader sector in the last three months given the inherent strengths of a robust brand portfolio and solid geographical reach. The company’s focus on developing near beer alternatives, expanding in the craft beer space and undertaking innovations is also worth noting. Moreover, the company seeks growth via mergers and acquisitions, as evident from its SABMiller buyout, after which it is likely to control about one-thirds of the beer industry. Estimates for the current fiscal have been going up ahead of the company’s second-quarter 2017 earnings release. However, AB InBev has a record of negative earnings surprises in recent quarters. The company’s last reported quarter marked its fifth straight earnings miss, as results were hurt by currency headwinds and persistent weakness in Brazil. Further, a tough macroeconomic environment and volatility in some of the core regions remain concerns.”


 Get Anheuser Busch Inbev NV alerts:



Other equities analysts have also recently issued reports about the company. Susquehanna Bancshares Inc  reaffirmed a “neutral” rating and issued a $101.00 target price (down from $109.00) on shares of Anheuser Busch Inbev NV in a report on Wednesday, April 26th. Vetr cut Anheuser Busch Inbev NV from a “hold” rating to a “sell” rating and set a $104.70 target price on the stock. in a report on Monday, May 1st. Jefferies Group LLC  reaffirmed a “buy” rating and issued a $132.00 target price on shares of Anheuser Busch Inbev NV in a report on Monday, May 15th. BidaskClub cut Anheuser Busch Inbev NV from a “hold” rating to a “sell” rating in a report on Wednesday, June 14th. Finally, Stifel Nicolaus  reaffirmed a “buy” rating and issued a $140.00 target price (up from $134.00) on shares of Anheuser Busch Inbev NV in a report on Friday, June 23rd. Three research analysts have rated the stock with a sell rating, eight have issued  a hold rating and twelve have given a buy rating to the company. The stock currently has an average rating of “Hold” and an average price target of $123.96.




Shares of Anheuser Busch Inbev NV (BUD) traded down 0.01% during trading on Wednesday, hitting $114.48. The stock had a trading volume of 269,522 shares. The stock’s 50-day moving average price is $113.79 and its 200 day moving average price is $111.13. Anheuser Busch Inbev NV has a 1-year low of $98.28 and a 1-year high of $136.08. The firm has a market capitalization of $221.37 billion and a P/E ratio of 83.62. 
WARNING: This news story was first  reported by Markets Daily and is the property of of Markets Daily. If you are reading this news story on another site, it was illegally copied and reposted in violation of US and international trademark & copyright laws. The correct version of this news story can be viewed at https://www.themarketsdaily.com/2017/07/19/anheuser-busch-inbev-nv-nysebud-upgraded-to-buy-by-zacks-investment-research.html. 
Hedge funds and other institutional investors have recently modified their holdings of the stock. Kistler Tiffany Companies LLC increased its position in shares of  Anheuser Busch Inbev NV by 151.9% in the first quarter. Kistler Tiffany Companies LLC now owns 985 shares of the consumer goods maker’s stock worth $108,000 after buying an additional 594 shares during the last quarter.  Jacobus Wealth Management Inc. increased its position in shares of  Anheuser Busch Inbev NV by 4.2% in the first quarter. Jacobus Wealth Management Inc. now owns 1,042 shares of the consumer goods maker’s stock worth $114,000 after buying an additional 42 shares during the last quarter.  Bronfman E.L. Rothschild L.P. increased its position in shares of  Anheuser Busch Inbev NV by 5.1% in the first quarter. Bronfman E.L. Rothschild L.P. now owns 1,103 shares of the consumer goods maker’s stock worth $121,000 after buying an additional 54 shares during the last quarter.  FTB Advisors Inc. increased its position in shares of  Anheuser Busch Inbev NV by 22.0% in the first quarter. FTB Advisors Inc. now owns 1,599 shares of the consumer goods maker’s stock worth $179,000 after buying an additional 288 shares during the last quarter.  Finally, Scout Investments Inc. acquired a new position in shares of  Anheuser Busch Inbev NV during the first quarter worth approximately $206,000. 
Anheuser Busch Inbev NV Company Profile
Anheuser Busch Inbev NV (AB InBev) is a Belgium-based company engaged in the brewers industry. The Company owns a portfolio of over 200 beer brands. The Company’s brand portfolio includes global brands, such as Budweiser, Corona and Stella Artois; international brands, including Beck’s, Leffe and Hoegaarden, and local champions, such as Bud Light, Skol, Brahma, Antarctica, Quilmes, Victoria, Modelo Especial, Michelob Ultra, Harbin, Sedrin, Klinskoye, Sibirskaya Korona, Chernigivske, Cass and Jupiler.







Receive News & Ratings for Anheuser Busch Inbev NV Daily - Enter your email address below to receive a concise daily summary of the latest news and analysts' ratings for Anheuser Busch Inbev NV and related companies with MarketBeat.com's FREE daily email newsletter.



 





























Latest News






Leave a Reply

Click here to cancel reply.




Name  (Required) 



Mail (will not be published)  (Required) 



Website





























































Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft













4imprint Promotional Products | Promo Items, Giveaways with Your Logo























Skip to Content

USA


search






advancedsearch




Call us toll free
1-877-446-7746


Loading call wait time...






  





Shop by Category

Shop by Category
Close this Menu


Apparel

All Categories
All Apparel

T-Shirts

Back
All T-Shirts
Promotional Tees
Athletic T Shirts
Fashion T Shirts
Tank Tops



Dress Shirts

Back
All Dress Shirts
Easy-Care Dress Shirts
Oxford Dress Shirts
Poplin Dress Shirts
Short Sleeve Dress Shirts
Twill Dress Shirts



Uniforms

Back
All Uniforms
Polos & Shirts for Uniforms
Food Service Uniforms
Hospitality Uniforms
Housekeeping Uniforms
Lab & Medical Uniforms
Security Uniforms



Polo Shirts

Back
All Polo Shirts
Cotton Polo Shirts
Golf & Sport Polo Shirts
Performance Polo Shirts
Pique Polo Shirts
Poly-Cotton Polo Shirts



Outerwear

Back
All Outerwear
Fleece Jackets & Vests
Insulated Outerwear
Lightweight Outerwear
Soft Shell Outerwear
Vests



Other Apparel

Back
All Other Apparel
Aprons
Bandanas
Pants & Shorts
Scarves



Sweatshirts

Back
All Sweatshirts
Crewneck Sweatshirts
Full Zip Sweatshirts
Hoodies



Headwear

Back
All Headwear
Baseball Hats
Beanies
Visors



Women's Apparel

Back
All Women's Apparel
Women's Dress Shirts
Women's Outerwear
Women's Polo Shirts
Women's T-Shirts


Sweaters & Cardigans
Athletic Apparel

Quick Links

Back
24 Hour Rush in Apparel
Hot Products in Apparel
New Products in Apparel
Sale Products in Apparel



Embroidered Apparel

Back
Embroidered Polo Shirts
Embroidered Outerwear
Embroidered Dress Shirts
Embroidered Headwear
Embroidered Sweatshirts



Shop by Brand

Back
Hanes Branded Apparel
Nike Branded Apparel
Under Armour Branded Apparel
Eddie Bauer Branded Apparel
Columbia Branded Apparel
Cutter & BuckBranded Apparel
Gildan Branded Apparel
Jerzees Branded Apparel
Champion Branded Apparel
Shop All Brands



Popular Products in Apparel




Crossland Fleece Jacket - Men's
On sale from $15.95





















Silk Touch Performance Sport Polo - Men's
$10.95 to $24.95





















Hanes Tagless T-Shirt - Screen - Colors
On sale from $4.35





















Blue Generation Peached Fine Line Twill Shirt – Ladies’
$15.75 to $31.50




















 

Auto, Home & Tools

All Categories
All Auto, Home & Tools

Auto Accessories

Back
All Auto Accessories
Ice Scrapers
Organizers
Safety Kits



Keychains

Back
All Keychains
Carabiners
Shaped Keychains
Bottle Openers



Living

Back
All Living
Coasters
Ornaments
Wine Accessories


Food & Lunch Containers
Pet Supplies
Flashlights

Kitchenware

Back
All Kitchenware
Chip Clips
Jar Openers



Tape Measures

Back
All Tape Measures
Pocket Size Tape Masures


Key Lights

Lawn & Garden

Back
All Lawn & Garden
Seeds & Grow-kits



Tools

Back
All Tools
Knives
Screwdrivers
Multi-tools & Kits



Quick Links

Back
24 Hour Rush in Auto, Home & Tools
Hot Products in Auto, Home & Tools
New Products in Auto, Home & Tools
Sale Products in Auto, Home & Tools



Popular Products in Auto, Home & Tools




Single Port USB Car Charger
99¢ to $1.79





















Salad Shaker Set
On sale from $1.89





















Keep-it Clip - 4" - Opaque
49¢ to 87¢





















Rectangular Key Light - Translucent
On sale from 57¢




















 

Bags

All Categories
All Bags

Totes

Back
All Totes
Shopping & Grocery
Trade Show Totes
Cotton Totes



Laptop & Tablet Bags

Back
All Laptop & Tablet Bags
Laptop Backpacks
Briefs & Messengers
Tech Cases & Pouches



Travel

Back
All Travel
Luggage Tags
Luggage & Travel Bags
Toiletry Bags



Coolers

Back
All Coolers
Lunch Bags & Sets
Outdoor & Event Coolers



Business Bags

Back
All Business Bags
Briefcase Bags
Messenger Bags



Plastic Bags

Back
All Plastic Bags
Biodegradable Bags
Full Color Bags


Drawstring Sportpacks
Backpacks
Paper Bags
Duffels & Gym Bags
Wallets
Gift Bags

Embroidered Bags

All Embroidered Bags
Backpacks
Business Bags
Duffels
Totes



Quick Links

Back
24 Hour Rush
Hot Products
New Products
Sale Products



Shop by Brand

All Bags
KOOZIE®
High Sierra
Coleman
Wenger
Cutter & Buck
Carhartt
Slazenger
Igloo
Case Logic
Nike
Shop All Brands



Popular Products in Bags




Wave Slingpack - Screen
$3.89 to $6.59





















Metro Shopper Tote
$1.35 to $2.45





















Championship Duffel
$5.25 to $8.99





















Square Non-Woven Lunch Bag
$1.69 to $2.99




















 

Drinkware

All Categories
All Drinkware

Water Bottles

Back
All Water Bottles
Recyclable Water Bottles
Metal Water Bottles
Tritan Water Bottles
Glass Water Bottles



Travel Mugs & Tumblers

Back
All Travel Mugs & Tumblers
Plastic Travel Mugs & Tumblers
Stainless Travel Mugs & Tumblers



Beverage Holders

Back
All Beverage Holders
Can Coolers
Bottle Coolers



Plastic Cups

Back
All Plastic Cups
Acrylic Cups w/Straws
Stadium Cups


Vacuum Insulated

Glassware

Back
All Glassware
Wine Glasses
Pint Glasses


Disposable Cups
Ceramic Mugs
Pub Glasses & Cups
Coasters

Quick Links

Back
24 Hour Rush Products in Drinkware
Hot Products in Drinkware
New Products in Drinkware
Sale Products in Drinkware



Shop by Brand

Back
KOOZIE® Branded Products in Drinkware
Camelbak Branded Products in Drinkware
Contigo Branded Products in Drinkware
Blender Bottle Branded Products in Drinkware
Thermos Branded Products in Drinkware
Bubba Branded Products in Drinkware
Cool Gear Branded Products in Drinkware
Coleman Branded Products in Drinkware
Cutter & Buck Branded Products in Drinkware
Shop All Brands



Popular Products in Drinkware




Glacier Stainless Vacuum Travel Tumbler - 30 oz.
On sale from $9.99





















Full Color Pocket Coolie
95¢ to $1.59





















Mega Vortex Tumbler - 16 oz.
On sale from $2.99





















Mood Stadium Cup - 12 oz.
On sale from 37¢




















 

Food & Candy

All Categories
All Food & Candy
Candy
Individually Wrapped
Bags
Chocolate
Cookies
Candy Jars
Gum
Mints
Tins
Nuts & Pretzels
Gift Boxes & Baskets
Packaged with Gift
Popcorn
Water & Beverages
BBQ Gifts
Mixed Assortment
Cheese & Meats
Wine Gifts

Quick Links

Back
24 Hour Rush in Food & Candy
Hot Products in Food & Candy
New Products in Food & Candy
Sale Products in Food & Candy



Shop by Brand

Back
Hershey's Branded Food & Candy
Jelly Belly Branded Food & Candy
Life Savers Branded Food & Candy
M&M's Branded Food & Candy
Mike & Ike Branded Food & Candy
Skittles Branded Food & Candy
Swedish Fish Branded Food & Candy
Shop All Brands



Popular Products in Food & Candy




Flip Top Dispenser with Sugar-Free Mints
47¢ to 99¢





















7 Way Assortment Tin - Small
$17.75 to $28.49





















Business Card Chocolate Treat - Thank You
$1.79 to $3.15





















Personalized Candy - 1/2 oz. - Chewy Sprees
59¢ to 99¢




















 

Office & Awards

All Categories
All Office & Awards

Magnets

Back
All Magnets
Business Card Magnets
Magnet Clips
Magnet Shapes
Car & Auto Magnets



Stickers & Decals

Back
All Stickers & Decals
Bumper Stickers & Auto
Stickers & Decals By the Roll
Permanent Stickers & Decals
Removable Stickers & Decals



Awards & Recognition

Back
All Awards & Recognition
Awards & Trophies
Certificate Holders
Plaques
Paperweights



Desk Accessories

Back
All Desk Accessories
Clips & Memo Holders
Letter Openers



Stress Relievers

Back
All Stress Relievers
Sport Shapes


Business Card Holders
Picture Frames
Rulers
Clocks
Books & Bookmarks
Calculators
Watches

Quick Links

Back
24 Hour Rush Products in Stickers & Decals
Hot Products in Stickers & Decals
New Products in Stickers & Decals
Sale Products in Stickers & Decals



Popular Products in Office & Awards




Landscaped Starfire Glass Paperweight - Full Color
$26.75 to $34.95





















Letter Opener - Opaque
On sale from 37¢





















Smiley Face Mood Stress Ball
$1.43 to $2.35





















Aluminum Card Case
$1.89 to $3.59




















 

Outdoor & Leisure

All Categories
All Outdoor & Leisure

Umbrellas

Back
All Umbrellas
Folding Umbrellas
Auto Open Umbrellas
Golf Umbrellas



Team Spirit

Back
All Team Spirit
Tattoos
Cheer & Noisemakers
Stadium Cushions



Golf

Back
All Golf
Golf Balls
Golf Tees
Golf Towels



Towels

Back
All Towels
Beach Towels
Sport & Fitness Towels



Blankets

Back
All Blankets
Embroidered Blankets


Chairs
Sunglasses
Sports
BBQ & Picnic
Hand Fans

Quick Links

Back
24 Hour Rush Products in Outdoor & Leisure
Hot Products in Outdoor & Leisure
New Products in Outdoor & Leisure
Sale Productsin Outdoor & Leisure



Popular Products in Outdoor & Leisure




Risky Business Sunglasses - Opaque
$1.35 to $2.35





















ShedRain Super Mini 42" Umbrella
$4.59 to $8.35





















Roll-Up Blanket – Navy/White Plaid with Navy Flap
On sale from $9.50





















Microfiber Golf Towel
99¢ to $1.69




















 

Stationery

All Categories
All Stationery

Padfolios

Back
All Padfolios
Junior Padfolios
Standard Padfolios
Zippered Closure Padfolios
Leather Padfolios
Holds iPad or Tablet



Cubes, Pads & Flags

Back
All Cubes, Pads & Flags
Post-it® Notes
Bic® Sticky Notes
Notepads
Pad & Flag Sets



Calendars

Back
All Calendars
Wall Calendars
Peel n Stick Calendars
Desk Calendars
Calendar Magnets
Academic Calendars



Notebooks & Journals

Back
All Notebooks & Journals
Perfect Bound Notebooks & Journals
Spiral Bound Notebooks & Journals
Jotters


Marketing Materials

Planners & Diaries

Back
All Planners & Diaries
2017 Planners
Pocket Calendars


Presentation Folders
Packaging
Greeting Cards
Document Holders
Binders
Clipboards

Quick Links

Back
24 Hour Rush Products in Stationery
Hot Products in Stationery
New Products in Stationery
Sale Products in Stationery



Shop by Brand

Back
Moleskine Branded Products in Stationery
Cutter & Buck Branded Products in Stationery
Wenger Branded Products in Stationery
Cross Branded Products in Stationery
Shop All Brands



Popular Products in Stationery




Bic Sticky Note 3" x 3" - 25 Sheet
On sale from 24¢





















Basic Memo Book - Full Color
29¢ to 77¢





















Neoskin Journal - 6" x 4"
$3.49 to $5.99





















Pedova Jr. Zippered Padfolio
$7.75 to $12.49




















 

Technology

All Categories
All Technology
Power Banks
USB Flash Drives
Stylus Pens & Tools

Tech Accessories

Back
All Tech Accessories
Car & Wall Chargers
USB Charging Cables
Screen Cleaners
USB Hubs



Tech Friendly Bags

Back
All Tech Friendly Bags
Laptop Backpacks
Business Bags
TSA-Friendly Bags
Laptop & Tablet Sleeves



Music & Audio

Back
All Music & Audio
Ear Buds
Headphones
Portable Speakers
Bluetooth & Wireless



Cell Phone Accessories

Back
All Cell Phone Accessories
Phone Cases
Adhesive Phone Wallets
Phone Stands & Holders



Tech Cases & Organizers

Back
All Tech Cases & Organizers
Cord Wraps
Cord Cases
Small Device Pouches


Mouse Pads

Quick Links

Back
24 Hour Rush Products in Technology
Hot Products in Technology
New Products in Technology
Sale Products in Technology



Popular Products in Technology




Energize Portable Power Bank
$4.99 to $8.99





















Swing USB Drive - 2GB - 3 Day
$4.25 to $7.35





















3 in 1 Noodle Charging Cable
$1.75 to $3.15





















Spectra Ear Buds and Phone Stand
$1.45 to $2.49




















 

Toys & Novelties

All Categories
All Toys & Novelties

Childrens Toys

Back
All Childrens Toys
Banks
Paper Masks & Hats
Stuffed Animals



Novelty & Sport Balls

Back
All Novelty & Sport Balls
Beach Balls
Footballs



Coloring & Art

Back
All Coloring & Art
Activity Pads
Coloring Books
Crayons & Colored Pencils


Balloons
Flyers
Executive Toys
Noisemakers
Tattoos
Light Up Novelties

Quick Links

Back
24 Hour Rush Products in Toys & Novelties
Hot Products in Toys & Novelties
New Products in Toys & Novelties
Sale Products in Toys & Novelties



Popular Products in Toys & Novelties




Value Playing Cards with Case
99¢ to $1.89





















Big Paw Bear - Brown
$4.35 to $7.35





















Lil' Piggy Bank - Translucent
99¢ to $1.95





















Light-Up Yo-Yo
86¢ to $1.33




















 

Trade Show & Signage

All Categories
All Trade Show & Signage

Table Covers & Throws

Back
All Table Covers & Throws
4' Table Length Table Covers & Throws
6' Table Length Table Covers & Throws
8' Table Length Table Covers & Throws
Convertible Table Covers & Throws
Table Runners



Banners, Flags & Signs

Back
All Banners, Flags & Signs
Retractable Banners
Indoor Banners & Signs
Outdoor Banners & Signs



Lanyards & Badges

Back
All Lanyards & Badges
Lanyards
Retractable Badge Holders
Neck Wallets
Name Tags & Badges



Lanyard & ID Holder Accessories

Back
All Lanyard & ID Holder Accessories
Ribbons
Vinyl Badge/ID Holders
Lanyard Cards



Display Accessories

Back
All Display Accessories
Carry Cases for Display Accessories
Replacement Graphics Displays
Tables & Chairs



Food Service Supplies

Back
All Food Service Supplies
Napkins
Drinkware
Cup Sleeves


Table Top Displays
Trade Show Games
Floor Displays
Display Kits
Tents
Literature Displays
Giveaways

Quick Links

Back
24 Hour Rush Products in Trade Show & Signage
Hot Products in Trade Show & Signage
New Products in Trade Show & Signage
Sale Products in Trade Show & Signage



Popular Products in Trade Show & Signage




Value Indoor Banner - 3' x 4'
$24.00 to $73.00





















Briefcase Tabletop Display with Curved Header - 18" x 48"-FC
$399.00 to $495.00





















Economy Lanyard - 1/2" - Metal Bulldog Clip
84¢ to $2.20





















Prize Wheel with Soft Carry Case
$425.00 to $549.00




















 

Wellness & Safety

All Categories
All Wellness & Safety

Personal Care

Back
All Personal Care
Mirrors
Emery Boards & Manicure



First Aid

Back
All First Aid
Bandages
First Aid Kits
Hot/Cold Packs



Safety

Back
All Safety
Reflective Stickers & Lights



Healthcare

Back
All Healthcare
Pill Boxes


Hand Sanitizers
Fitness
Pedometers
Lip Balm
Sunscreen
Educational Guides
Awareness Bracelets
Buttons

Quick Links

Back
24 Hour Rush Products in Wellness & Safety
Hot Products in Wellness & Safety
New Products in Wellness & Safety
Sale Products in Wellness & Safety



Popular Products in Wellness & Safety




Bandage Dispenser - Opaque - Natural
45¢ to 79¢





















Silk Touch Performance Sport Polo - Men's
$10.95 to $24.95





















Emery Board - Zebra
16¢ to 25¢





















Round Reflector Light
89¢ to $1.64




















 

Writing

All Categories
All Writing

Pens

Back
All Pens
Value Pens
Gel Ink Pens
Novelty Pens



Pencils

Back
All Pencils
Standard Pencils
Mechanical Pencils
Novelty Pencils
Golf Pencils



Multi Function Writing

Back
All Multi Function Writing
Highlighter Pen Combos
Multi-Ink Pens



Writing Sets

Back
All Writing Sets
Pen & Pencil Sets


Executive Writing
Stylus Pens
Highlighters
Markers

Quick Links

Back
24 Hour Rush Products in Writing
Hot Products in Writing
New Products in Writing
Sale Productsin Writing



Shop by Brand

Back
Bic Branded Products in Writing
Paper Mate Branded Products in Writing
Sharpie Branded Products in Writing
Uni-Ball Branded Products in Writing
Shop All Brands



Popular Products in Writing




Wolverine Pen
On sale from 27¢





















Bic Brite Liner Grip
59¢ to 99¢





















MopTopper Stylus Pen
99¢ to $1.69





















Sharpie Mini Canister - Assorted Fashion Colors
$117.00 to $165.00




















 

See More

All Categories

4imprint Shops

Back to 4imprint Shops
4imprint Budget Savers4imprint FavoritesBasics - Marketing Staples That Work!Business GiftsChurch and Religious PromotionsColor Collection - Choose Items by ColorCommunity and Family ActivitiesGifts By PriceHome Ideas - Items Used Around the HouseHuman ResourcesItems By IndustryJust For FunLadies' and FashionPromotional Products for EducationPromotional Products for GovernmentPromotional Products for HealthcarePublic SafetyShapes - Apple, Star, Heart...Sports
See All Shops



4imprint Quick Links

Back to Quick Links
Hot Products
Sale Products
New Products
Price Drops
24hr Service
Exclusive Designs
USA Made
Product Reviews
Video Gallery



More Ways to Shop

Back to More Ways to Shop
Brands
Capacity
Eco Friendly
Helpful Links
Imprint Method
Material
Recycling Code
Size
Style
See All Categories


 






24 Hour Rush


Exclusive Items


Hot Products


New Products


On Sale


Go to our Outlet Site











Promotional Products by 4imprint





Andywith 4imprint10 years








No Worries,I've got this
Tight deadline? Looking for the perfect product? No problem! We're here to make it happen - and it's on-time or FREE.
Be Worry-Free








Erinwith 4imprint12 years








Want to be sure?Samples are the cure.
We're all about 'try before you buy'. Free samples make finding the perfect product perfectly simple!
Learn About Samples








Libbywith 4imprint7 years








Making you look good.That's my thing.
Need art modifcations, tweaks, adjustments – or even art from scratch? Our art pros have your back – for free!
Your Art Team








Sarawith 4imprint15 years








Magical MerchandiseI find it and bring it to you.
Your brand on the right product makes the magic happen. We've got that 'perfect product' you're looking for - including your favorite brand names.
Our Merchandising Magic








Staceywith 4imprint6 years








We know it's not just a productif it's got your logo on it.
You want to look good and you want your company to look good. We get that - and we've got a guarantee to back it up!
Why Buy From Us












Weekly Deal!Save up to 32%





Rockdale Lunch Cooler




As low as $1.89!

Shop the Rockdale 6-Pack Lunch Cooler Now 








Featured Promotional Product Categories








Shop All Promotional Business Apparel Products
Outfit your team with custom imprinted apparel!

Shop Apparel














Shop All Promotional Drinkware Products for Your Business
Save on custom personalized drinkware!

Shop Drinkware














Shop All Promotional Bags for Your Marketing Campaign
Bundle up your promotions with personalized bags!

Shop Bags














Shop All Giveaways Under $1 each
Giveaways under $1 to fit any promotional budget!

Shop Under $1














Shop All Promotional Trade Show & Signage Products for Your Event
Demand attention with logo'd trade show traffic-stoppers!

Shop Trade Show














Shop All Giveaway Items on Sale
Special prices, deals & steals on top promotional giveaways!

Shop Sale














Shop All Personalized Stationery Items
Customize your own folders, notepads, Post-it® Notes & more!

Shop Stationery














Shop All Imprinted Technology Products
Stay modern with logo'd computer accessories & electronics!

Shop Technology




















Striped Travel Pocket
outlet price as low as $1.59
make an offer


Shop the Outlet Store now!







deal
of
the
day







more upcoming deals start soon!


Grab today's deal before it's gone!









Heidi, with4imprint18 years
Josh, with4imprint11 years




Embroidery Made Easy
The price you see is the price you pay!

No upcharge for extended sizes.
Order as few as 6 pieces.
$35 tape charge; FREE on orders of 24 pieces or more on polos, dress shirts & jackets!
No stitch counts - if your logo fits in the described embroidered area, there are no additional fees. Period.


Shop Embroidery Now 




Tanya, with4imprint11 years




ValueBuy

Hurry, quantities are limited!



Stretch your budget even further with incredible savings on our Collette Pen. Available in six eye-catching colors.


Shop The Collette Pen Now 




Cat, with 4imprint4 years




reFresh Brand

A drinkware brand only from 4imprint!
Bright colors, smart styling and great value! Perfect for everything from promoting wellness to getting your brand out there at summer events. Choose from six different styles, three different sizes and over 40 different color combinations. 

Shop reFresh Now 







Mary, with4imprint3 years



Mary Recommends


I do a lot of bike riding, and I log my minutes for our wellness program at 4imprint. This bottle makes a great companion!
Shop the O2COOL ArcticSqueeze Insulated Sport Bottle Now





Marcia, with4imprint4 years



Marcia Recommends


These are great for summer cookouts. Even I can cook and look like a pro!
Shop the Frosted Silicone Oven Mitt Now






#SwaggingRights Customer photos
Real life examples of how our products can help your promotional needs shine.






























































10 Popular Search Terms


Search for 106759
4 products




Search for coffee mugs
503 products




Search for cups
1670 products




Search for drawstring bags
592 products




Search for mug
1198 products




Search for notebook
996 products




Search for pencils
550 products




Search for power bank
103 products




Search for sunglasses
232 products




Search for umbrella
302 products





4imprint Information and Contact Links


Connect with Us











Need Help?
Call 1-877-446-7746


 Live Chat




 Email





Be in the Know
Sign up to be notified about the latest trends, products, and news.

Please enter a valid email address
Email address



Sign Up for 4imprint News


Thank you for signing up!

































Nations Financial Group | Independent Financial Advisor | Independent Broker Dealer | Nations Financial Group provides unbiased advice plus the strength and support of one of the top investment firms in America.












































Check the background of this financial professional on FINRA's BrokerCheck
X





Nations Financial Group | Independent Financial Advisor | Independent Broker Dealer

advisor login
investor Ebrokerage login







InvestorTrust. Integrity. Exceptional personal attention. Isn’t it time you worked with a financial advisor that delivers more?


AdvisorNations. A new breed of financial service firm.













 























































Nations Financial Group - 600 5th St, Ames, IA - Phone Number - Yelp

  





















                        Skip to Search Form
                    evfcybqqcyzyuzardtc



                        Skip to Navigation
                    



                        Skip to Page Content
                    








Yelp











Find












Near
















                            Cancel
    









Search




































                    Sign Up
    



            Log In
        

























                            Login
    



                            Sign Up
    










About Me
            
















Talk
            




































            Restaurants

        











            Nightlife

        











            Home Services

        








            Write a Review

        






            Events

        






            Talk

        







            Log In
        











 











600 5th StAmes, IA 50010


        (515) 233-1847
    






            Nations Financial Group
        






Unclaimed
        


This business has not yet been claimed by the owner or a representative.
Claim this business to view business statistics, receive messages from prospective customers, and respond to reviews.









        Add
        , Opens a popup

Add categories













Write a Review
    







            Add Photo
    






Share
, Opens a popup







Bookmark
, Opens a popup





















Get directions













































Swap start/end points
Start from












Start from
Swap start/end points











Nations Financial Group


        600 5th St, Ames, IA 50010
    




Get directions


























Edit




        600 5th StAmes, IA 50010
    










Get Directions








Phone number

        (515) 233-1847
    






 
Business website
nationsfg.com









Send to your Phone











Is this your business?
Respond to reviews and customer messages.Claiming is free, and only takes a minute.
Claim This Business

























Ask the Community


                Yelp users haven’t asked any questions yet about Nations Financial Group.
            
Ask a Question













Rating



1 (Eek! Methinks not.)



2 (Meh. I've experienced better.)



3 (A-OK.)



4 (Yay! I'm a fan.)



5 (Woohoo! As good as it gets!)






                    Hey there trendsetter! You could be the first review for Nations Financial Group.
                





Is this your business?






Once you’ve claimed, you can:

Immediately update business information
Respond to reviews and customer messages
See the customer leads your business page generates
Monitor how many people view your business page

Claim This Business









Business info summary











Edit business info








            Hours
        





Add business hours
    


Browse nearby








Restaurants









Nightlife









Shopping









Show all











Rating Details





                    5 stars
                





0






                    4 stars
                





0






                    3 stars
                





0






                    2 stars
                





0






                    1 star
                





0





We calculate the overall star rating using only reviews that our automated software currently recommends. Learn more.




Text to Phone












                    Oops, looks like something’s wrong. Try again!
                


×














                    Are you a human? Please complete the bot challenge below.
                


×














Sent! Check your phone to view the link now!
                


×


















Nations Financial Group



Ames, IA




Text a link to your phone so you can quickly get directions, see photos, and read reviews on the go!





+1






















Text Link


                            Your carrier’s rates may apply
                        

















About


About Yelp


Order Food on Eat24


Careers


Press


Investor Relations


Content Guidelines


Terms of Service


Privacy Policy


Ad Choices






Discover


The Local Yelp


Yelp Blog


Support


Yelp Mobile


Developers


RSS






Yelp for Business Owners


Claim your Business Page


Advertise on Yelp


Online Ordering from Eat24


Yelp Reservations


Business Success Stories


Business Support


Yelp Blog for Business Owners







Languages


















                Bahasa Malaysia (Malaysia)
        







                Čeština (Česká republika)
        







                Dansk (Danmark)
        







                Deutsch (Deutschland)
        





                Deutsch (Schweiz)
        





                Deutsch (Österreich)
        







                English (Australia)
        





                English (Belgium)
        





                English (Canada)
        





                English (Hong Kong)
        





                English (Malaysia)
        





                English (New Zealand)
        





                English (Philippines)
        





                English (Republic of Ireland)
        





                English (Singapore)
        





                English (Switzerland)
        





                English (United Kingdom)
        





                English (United States)
        







                Español (Argentina)
        





                Español (Chile)
        





                Español (España)
        





                Español (México)
        







                Filipino (Pilipinas)
        







                Français (Belgique)
        





                Français (Canada)
        





                Français (France)
        





                Français (Suisse)
        







                Italiano (Italia)
        





                Italiano (Svizzera)
        







                Nederlands (België)
        





                Nederlands (Nederland)
        







                Norsk (Norge)
        







                Polski (Polska)
        







                Português (Brasil)
        





                Português (Portugal)
        







                Suomi (Suomi)
        







                Svenska (Finland)
        





                Svenska (Sverige)
        







                Türkçe (Türkiye)
        







                日本語 (日本)
        







                繁體中文 (台灣)
        





                繁體中文 (香港)
        









Countries


















                Argentina
        







                Australia
        







                Austria
        







                Belgium
        







                Brazil
        







                Canada
        







                Chile
        







                Czech Republic
        







                Denmark
        







                Finland
        







                France
        







                Germany
        







                Hong Kong
        







                Italy
        







                Japan
        







                Malaysia
        







                Mexico
        







                New Zealand
        







                Norway
        







                Philippines
        







                Poland
        







                Portugal
        







                Republic of Ireland
        







                Singapore
        







                Spain
        







                Sweden
        







                Switzerland
        







                Taiwan
        







                The Netherlands
        







                Turkey
        







                United Kingdom
        







                United States
        













Site Map

Atlanta
Austin
Boston
Chicago
Dallas
Denver
Detroit
Honolulu
Houston
Los Angeles
Miami
Minneapolis
New York
Philadelphia
Portland
Sacramento
San Diego
San Francisco
San Jose
Seattle
Washington, DC
More Cities






About


Blog


Support


Terms





            Copyright © 2004–2017 Yelp Inc. Yelp, ,  and related marks are registered trademarks of Yelp.
    


















































Bing Places for Business
























































































































Bing
 places for business


Sign in using your




Microsoft Account





Work Account





Google Account





Facebook Account

Don't have an account? Create one.


